<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88923-0022 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.9-23-88.f2.A1021</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="94"><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="59"/><ITAG tagnum="52">40 CFR Part 281 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[FRL-3385-4] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Underground Storage Tanks; State Program Approval </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Environmental Protection Agency (EPA).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) today finalizesregulations for approval of states to run underground storage tank programsin lieu of the federal program. These regulations were first proposed onApril 17, 1987 (52 FR 12853) and were further developed in a subsequentSupplemental Notice published on December 23, 1987 (52 FR 48638). Subtitle I of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act (RCRA) establishesa federal program for the regulation of underground storage tanks (USTs)Subtitle I of RCRA also allows EPA to approve state programs to operatein place of the federal UST requirements if those state programs have standardsthat are no less stringent than the federal requirements and provide adequateenforcement of compliance with those standards. States with approved USTprograms will have primary enforcement responsibility with respect to USTprogram requirements in their states. Today's rule establishes final requirementsfor approval of state UST programs and for streamlined procedures to beused in submitting and evaluating state applications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>These regulations will become effective on December 22,1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES: </T2>The public docket for this rulemaking is availablefor public inspection from 9:00 a.m to 4:00 p.m., Monday through Friday,excluding holidays at: Office of Underground Storage Tanks (WH-562A), DocketNo. UST 4, U.S. Environmental Protection Agency, 401 M Street SW., Washington,DC 20460. Call (202) 475-9720 to make an appointment with docket clerk.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2> RCRA/SUPERFUND Hotline, (800)424-9346; or in Washington, DC, (202) 382-3000.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>The contents of today's preamble arelisted in the following outline:<ITAG tagnum="26">I. Authority </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">II. Background </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">A. Subtitle I of RCRA (Section 9004) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">B. Summary of the April 17 Proposal </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">C. Summary of Supplemental Notice </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">D. Summary of Public Comments </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">E. Important Influences on Today's Rule </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">III. Summary of Today's Rule </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">A. Summary of Today's Rule </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">B. Strategy for State Program Approval </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">IV. Analysis of Today's Rule </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">A. Subpart A_Purpose, General Requirements and Scope (andSection;andSection;281.10-281.12) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">B. Subpart B_Components of a Program Application (andSection;andSection;281.20-281.25) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">C. Subpart C_Criteria for ``No Less Stringent'' (andSection;andSection;281.30-281.36) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">D. Subpart D_Adequate Enforcement of Compliance (andSection;andSection;281.40-281.43) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">E. Subpart E_Approval Procedures (andSection;andSection; 281.56-281.52)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">F. Subpart F_Withdrawal of Approval of State Programs (andSection;andSection;281.60-281.61) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">V. Relationship to Other EPA Programs </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">A. Leaking Underground Storage Tank Petroleum Response Fund </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">B. RCRA Hazardous Waste Program </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">VI. Economic and Regulatory Impacts </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">A. Regulatory Impact Analysis </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">B. Regulatory Flexibility Act </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">C. Paperwork Reduction Act </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Authority </ITAG>These regulations are promulgated under sections 9004, 9005, 9006 and 2002of the Solid Waste Disposal Act, as amended. <ITAG tagnum="84">II. Background </ITAG>A. Subtitle I of RCRA (section 9004) The Hazardous and Solid Waste Amendments of 1984 added Subtitle I to theResource Conservation and Recovery Act (RCRA). Subtitle I establishes afederal program for the regulation of underground storage tanks and hasthe following components. Section 9002 requires each owner of an underground storage tank (UST) inoperation after 1973 to notify the designated state agency of the existenceof the tank and the tank age, size, type, location, and use. This notificationwas due on May 8, 1986, or within 30 days after an owner brings a new USTinto use. Section 9003(a) requires EPA to promulgate standards and requirements fornew and existing USTs covering detection, prevention, and correction ofreleases. These regulations are set forth in the final UST technical standardspublished elsewhere in today's <T4>Federal Register</T4>. Section 9003(g) establishes a prohibition on the installation of certainUSTs from May 8, 1985 until the effective date of EPA's new tank performancestandards established under section 9003(e). Section 9003(h), added toSubtitle I under section 205 of the Superfund Amendments and ReauthorizationAct of 1986, establishes a program for cleanup of petroleum from leakingUSTs. Section 9004 provides a procedure by which states may administer and enforcestate UST programs in lieu of the federal program established under section9003. Under section 9004, states may submit their programs to EPA and willbe approved by EPA if the state program meets the requirements for notificationfound under section 9002, provides for adequate enforcement of compliancewith all program requirements, and includes requirements that are no lessstringent than the corresponding federal UST technical standards for leakdetection and prevention, recordkeeping for leak detection, reporting ofreleases and corrective action, corrective action, closure, financial responsibility,and new tank standards. Section 9004 specifies that a state program submittedto EPA for approval may cover petroleum substances, hazardous substances(not including hazardous wastes), or both. Under Subtitle I, a state with an approved UST program has primary enforcementresponsibility for the requirements of its program. EPA retains authorityto take enforcement action in approved states as necessary and will notifythe designated lead state agency of any such intended action in accordancewith procedures contained in a memorandum of agreement executed with EPAand section 9006(a)(2) of RCRA. In this rulemaking, EPA establishes requirementsthat a state UST program must meet in order for EPA to approve the programunder section 9004. These regulations are codified in Part 281 of the Codeof Federal Regulations. In section 9004, Congress clearly provided EPA the authority to authorizestate UST programs to operate in lieu of the federal program. Congressionalintent that Subtitle I be implemented at the state level is supported byits legislative history. In introducing the Subtitle I legislation in 1984,its sponsor stated: ``The purpose of this amendment is to establish a constructivefederal role to aid the states in establishing programs to safeguard theirwater supplies. Passage of this program will help to ensure consistencybetween state programs and tank standards and measured progress towardour goal of protecting ground water from this ubiquitous source of contamination.''130 Cong. Rec. 9164 (daily ed. July 25, 1984) (statement of Senator Durenberger).Accordingly, EPA believes that Congress intended EPA to play an importantleadership role by establishing UST criteria, and that, consistent withstatutory requirements, the state and local governments should carry outthe program wherever possible. This Congressional intent has been influentialin shaping today's final rule for state UST program approval. B. Summary of the April 17 Proposal The April 17, 1987 proposal (52 FR 12853) solicited public comments onseveral topics concerning requirements and procedures for approving stateUST programs to operate in place of federal UST regulations. In the proposal,EPA discussed the two criteria for approval that are required under section9004 of RCRA. EPA described requirements for ensuring ``adequate enforcementof compliance'', including the specific legal authorities that must beavailable to the state enforcement agency. The proposal also presentedthree possible approaches that could be used to determine whether statetechnical and program requirements are ``no less stringent'' than the federalstandards. In addition, the proposal contained a number of procedural and administrativerequirements. The proposal outlined the components of a standard applicationfor approval. These components include: A program description; an AttorneyGeneral's statement; an implementation plan that includes a Memorandumof Agreement; and copies of all applicable state laws and regulations.Furthermore, the proposal suggested procedures that EPA will follow whenevaluating state applications for approval or when withdrawing approvalof state programs. The procedures for reviewing a state application forapproval must be completed within 180 days, according to section 9004,and the proposal provided details on how the review should proceed: (1)Confirm that an application is complete; (2) review the application; (3)publish a tentative decision in the <T4>Federal Register;</T4> (4) consider public comments and hold publichearings if necessary; and (5) publish a final decision in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. Finally, the proposal reflected the provision in section 9004 that, incases when a state program has requirements that are less stringent incertain areas than corresponding federal requirements, EPA could approvethese programs on an interim basis. The proposal clarified the requirementsand procedures concerning the content and review of a state applicationfor such interim approvals. C. Summary of Supplemental Notice EPA published a Supplemental Notice on December 23, 1987 (52 FR 48638)that requested public comments on some aspects of state program approvalthat EPA believed needed further clarification. The two parts of this supplementalnotice that dealt specifically with state program approval are summarizedbelow.One part of the supplemental notice addressed the ``no less stringent''issue and provided further details for public review and comment on howthe Agency intended to implement its proposed approach to state programapproval: A comparison of each of the technical program elements of thestate program to the federal objectives for the corresponding program elements.For example, a state's regulations for release detection as a whole wouldbe compared to the federal objectives for release detection. As long asthe state program's overall requirements for release detection were ``noless stringent'' than the federal objectives for release detection, thenEPA could approve that state program element. An essential part of thisprocess was the identification in the supplemental notice of federal objectivesfor each of the eight program elements. These federal objectives were proposedto clarify what constitutes acceptable ``no less stringent'' requirementsin state programs. The other part of the supplemental notice concerning the issue of stateprogram approval requested comment on providing additional flexibilityto implementing agencies by changing the wording of several sections ofthe technical standards proposed on April 17. These proposed wording changeswere intended to allow state implementing agencies to substitute theirown procedural and administrative requirements for those detailed in thefederal technical standards for USTs. D. Summary of Public Comments EPA received many comments regarding both the April 17 proposed rule forstate program approval and the December 23 supplemental notice. Four majorissues were identified by public comment: Implementation by states andlocalities; adequate enforcement; no-less-stringent criteria; and federalfunding. These issues are briefly highlighted below and discussed in moredetail in section IV of today's preamble. andbullet; <T3>Implementation by states and localities. </T3>Many commenters expressedconcern about the potential for a lack of national consistency, which theybelieved would be an inherent result of the proposed rule for state programapproval. They recommended that EPA not approve state regulations thatwould be different and perhaps more stringent than the federal rule. Inaddition, several other commenters were concerned that implementation ofthe UST program by local governments, specifically those with differenttechnical regulations, would cause confusion for the regulated community.EPA received other comments concerning implementation by local governments.Generally, these commenters requested that EPA's final approval rule requirethat states negotiate with localities and include them in plans for USTprogram implementation. andbullet; <T3>Adequate enforcement criteria.</T3> In defining what constitutes ``adequateenforcement'', commenters particularly wanted clarification of EPA's policyregarding enforcement. Some commenters requested that broad objectivesbe developed as a means of approval in the federal rule, and some suggestedsuch objectives should be part of the regulations. Others thought thatguidance alone would be appropriate. Commenters also objected to the requirementsfor inspections and surveys, and wanted clarification of EPA's expectations.Regarding legal authorities required for enforcement, many commenters feltthat states must be allowed to evaluate their own penalties and devisetheir own approaches on a case-by-case basis, and that EPA could require,at a minimum, general categories of authorities without dictating theirterms. Finally, many commenters expressed concern about EPA's public participationrequirements for state program approvals. Some commenters suggested thatstates should be allowed to assess the degree of participation necessaryfor each individual case, while others questioned the statutory authorityfor requiring specific levels of participation as criteria for approval.andbullet; <T3>No less stringent criteria. </T3>In the April 17 preamble, EPA hadconsidered three options for determining whether state programs meet theno-less-stringent criteria. Some commenters supported EPA's proposed approach(option 3), which compares the state and federal programs element-by-element,as the most flexible and implementable. An ``element'', was one of theparagraphs (1) through (8) in section 9004(a). Each paragraph defined anelement, for example, release detection. Others claimed that only the holisticapproach of option 1 that evaluates the overall results of a program gavestates sufficient flexibility. These commenters also stressed that effectivenessin meeting the environmental goals should be considered first in approvingstates rather than the ability to meet specific individual legal requirements.A few commenters supported the line-by-line approach of option 2, believingthat the flexibility of the other options could lead to the approval ofinadequate programs. Many comments were received on EPA's proposed approach to implementingstate program approval. Most commenters agreed with the use of objectivesfor determining the stringency of state programs and liked the objectivesthat EPA outlined in the December 23 supplemental notice. In general, theybelieved the objectives would facilitate state program approval by allowingstate programs the necessary room to develop regulations appropriate tothe individual state's geographical characteristics and regulated communities.For the same reason, these commenters also liked EPA's proposal to providestates additional decisionmaking authority within the technical and financialresponsibility regulations. Some commenters, however, did express reservations about EPA's proposedapproach to provide states with flexibility. Most of these commenters feltthat while flexibility was an admirable goal, consistency was also important.These commenters argued that the proposed regulations, particularly theadditional state decisionmaking authority in the technical standards, allowedtoo much flexibility to the states without providing assurances that suchflexibility was necessary to protect human health and the environment.A few commenters disagreed completely with the objectives approach andstated that objectives were not a substitute for detailed technical requirements.andbullet; <T3>Federal funding.</T3> Some commenters raised the issue of the highcost of developing state UST programs compared to the small amount of federalfunding available to assist state program development. They protested thatEPA wanted states to run a program without sharing sufficient funds tomake it possible and they urged the Federal Government to provide moregrant money. E. Important Influences on Today's Rule In developing today's final rule for state program approval, the Agencyhas taken into consideration several characteristics of the UST systemuniverse that are associated with any attempt to regulate UST system management.The following sections identify and discuss the influence of specific featuresof the UST system universe on the approval of state programs. <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Leaking USTs Present a Unique Regulatory Challenge </ITAG>EPA's approach to the regulation of UST systems on a national scale mustbe different from that undertaken by most of its other regulatory programsbecause the UST problem is significantly different. This difference ismainly due to two factors: The large number of facilities to be regulatedand the nature of the regulated community. The most significant problem is the sheer size of the regulated community.Nationally, over 700,000 UST facilities account for about 2 million USTsystems. Estimates indicate that roughly 75 percent of existing UST systemsare unprotected from corrosion (and thus present a serious environmentalrisk). A relatively high proportion of UST facilities (10 to 30 percent)already have had a leak, and soon others will leak unless measures aretaken to upgrade them Another problem arises from the nature of the regulated community. A largeproportion of USTs are owned by small businesses with $500,000 or lessin total assets. For example, 72 percent of all retail motor fuel outletsare owned by small businesses. These small entrepreneurs, who are usedto operating their businesses under minimal regulation, will be significantlyaffected by environmental regulations for UST systems. In the promulgationof the technical standards elsewhere in today's <T4>Federal Register</T4>, EPA has attempted to minimize the regulatoryimpact on small businesses without compromising the statutory requirementsto protect human health and the environment. In addition, the problem of releases from USTs is multi-faceted. Thereare three major sources of release incidents: Product delivery piping failures;corrosion of unprotected tanks; and spills and overfills. Environmentalregulations for UST systems must be aimed at preventing these differenttypes of petroleum and hazardous substance releases as well as increasingthe ability to quickly detect and minimize the contamination of soil andground water by such releases, and ensuring adequate cleanup of contamination.To do this, UST regulatory requirements must address every phase of thelife cycle of a storage tank system: Selection of the tank system; installation;operation and maintenance; financial responsibility; closure; and cleanupof the site where releases have occurred. In summary, the size of this regulated community, the predominance of smallbusiness ownership of the UST systems, and the need for comprehensive managementof an UST so that releases are minimized during its operating life presenta unique regulatory challenge. This challenge calls for the considerationof new approaches from federal, state, and local regulators. Some existingstate and local UST programs already provide effective UST management througha variety of different approaches. In developing a strategy for approvalof state UST programs, EPA has been guided by a realization that thereis often more than one way to ensure sound UST management using differentregulatory approaches.<ITAG tagnum="81">2. Challenges for Compliance and Enforcement </ITAG>The experience of state and local agencies that are currently implementingUST programs demonstrates two realities. First, large businesses are generallywilling and have already begun to comply with UST requirements. Second,small business owners, with limited resources and knowledge of federalregulations, often need more direct attention and technical assistanceto ensure compliance. Given the unique nature of this regulated community,EPA believes the UST regulatory program will be most effectively carriedout by those who are closest to the problem, who can respond quickly, andwho can create a visible presence, that is, the state and local governments.In addition, successful implementation of this program depends a greatdeal on the regulated community's voluntary compliance with the requirementsbecause, ultimately, they are responsible for conducting the work underthis new program. Also, the large number of facilities and the numeroustypes of activities that take place on-site preclude the implementing agencyfrom being present to ensure that tank management activities are performedproperly. Compliance is best prompted by owners and operators who are clearlyinformed of the regulations and in close contact with the regulators. Interactionbetween regulators and UST system owners during the development of a regulatoryprogram and during program implementation can be used to gain acceptancewithin the regulated community, and may be most effective at the stateand local level. Another incentive for voluntary compliance can be thetype of regulations developed at the state level. For example, the federaltechnical requirements, where possible, rely on familiar industry codesand build on recognized trends developing in the field of UST management.Because much of the environmental improvement from the UST program willcome from the regulated community's voluntary compliance, the process ofapproving state programs should recognize that regulatory approaches developedin response to the specific needs of different local areas may be moreappropriate and thus better understood by the regulated community. <ITAG tagnum="81">3. State and Local UST Programs Are Already Underway </ITAG>Many states and localities have already begun to address the ground-watercontamination threat and cleanup problems posed by leaking USTs. At least18 states have developed UST programs that, at a minimum, regulate thebasic elements of proper UST system management. Although all of these programsaddress petroleum UST systems, only a few currently include hazardous substanceUSTs within their scope. Other states have enacted legislation and aredeveloping a regulatory program. Because many of these states plan to useEPA's rules to guide their own regulatory decisions, EPA expects stateprogress in developing regulations to proceed rapidly with the appearanceof today's final rule on the technical standards. This high level of state activity has taken many routes. Some state programshave established stringent release detection for existing USTs (Californiaand Florida), and others emphasize state-of-the-art prevention technologiesfor new USTs (New York, California, and New Hampshire). Some are phasingin the upgrading or replacement of existing substandard systems (Florida,Connecticut, and Delaware). Others have attempted to tailor their standard-settingbased on proximity to sensitive ground-water locations (Maine and SouthCarolina). EPA has closely studied these state regulatory program approachesand found that diversity on important technical issues is often the rulerather than the exception. EPA believes that its approach toward the approvalof state programs must accommodate these differences where such initiativesare no less stringent than the federal program. Many county and municipal governments also are already implementing USTprograms. Over 100 major cities in the U.S. have developed local UST ordinancesand programs. Some programs are operated independently of the state; othersare part of a wider state regulatory program. The implementation role oflocal agencies in the UST regulatory effort is being encouraged in manystates in hopes of making use of available local manpower (such as firemarshals and building code officials) and thus improving overall enforcementand administrative capabilities. Three of the leading state UST programs_NewYork, Florida, and California_have begun to work out solid working relationshipswith local UST programs within the state, a policy that is believed tobe critical to the success of the state program. In several of the easternurban counties of New York, the state has delegated authority to the countygovernments, allowing the state agency to focus its efforts on implementingthe UST program in the less urban counties where local UST programs areless developed. In Florida, Dade and Broward counties have been given authorityto implement the UST program in their jurisdictions. Several other countiesin the state are reported to be considering local UST programs. Californiahas given responsibility for administering and enforcing the state USTprogram to over 100 local county and city agencies. In order to protect vulnerable ground-water supplies or in response toa series of local incidents, some local governments have issued their ownordinances, regulations or by-laws, even in the absence of any state regulatoryaction. In some cases, these local controls predate the corresponding stateregulations and may be more stringent than their state counterparts. Savannah,Georgia; New Orleans, Louisiana; and San Antonio and Austin, Texas areexamples of localities that have created their own UST regulations. InMassachusetts, at least 78 communities have enacted some level of UST controls.EPA has noted over the past three years that these independent actionsat the local level often are the precursors to the development of an USTprogram for the entire state (as occurred in California, Florida, and NewYork). EPA believes the high level of local UST program activity nationwide willincrease with today's promulgation of the federal technical standards andas numerous state programs begin to develop or revise their own regulatorystandards in response. Also, as other states begin to wrestle with thereality of how to implement their UST programs and as the dangers posedby existing UST systems become more widely known, local UST programs andinvolvement should increase significantly over current levels. <ITAG tagnum="81">4. EPA's National UST Program Strategy and State Program Approval</ITAG>The factors discussed above led EPA to conclude that the approach takenin today's final rule is the most effective way to implement this approvalprogram. First, the state program approval language of section 9004 ofRCRA, as well as its legislative history indicates that Congress intendedstate and local UST programs to have a pivotal role in the national USTprogram. At the same time, however, it is clear that Congress intendedEPA to lead in establishing and supporting standards necessary to protecthuman health and the environment nationwide. The ``no less stringent''and ``adequate enforcement'' criteria must be met to ensure protectionof the nation's ground water. Second, the nature of the problem, the regulatedcommunity, and the work involved in implementing the regulatory programdictate that the actual day-to-day work take place at the state and locallevel. EPA has concluded that much of the environmental improvement tobe gained under this program will be made through supporting and buildingthe implementation efforts of state and local UST programs. Third, substantialactivity is already occurring in states and localities, and EPA's approvalprocess should work to build, rather than disrupt, this established network.The Agency's role in approval, therefore, must focus on encouraging thestate and local governments to carry out their own unique programs. Theapproval of state programs, however, is just one step in a long-term strategyto develop a national UST program. EPA must look ahead to the actual implementationof the program after approval has been given. In facing the implementation challenge that today confronts the nationalUST program, EPA has concluded that the approval approach established todayis necessary to address the realities of the UST regulatory program. First,as more state and local governments become involved, the work of the USTprogram must be routinely repeated in thousands of jurisdictions nationwide.Several operating state and local UST programs already report that theyare quite busy ``running the store,'' and express surprise at the sizeof the regulated community and how fairly simple tasks must be routinelyrepeated numerous times for the implementing agency to be successful inbringing UST systems into, and maintaining, compliance. Second, visits to several state and local UST program offices have shownthat they have developed their own unique requirements and operate differentlyeven though they are geared towards solving similar technical problems.They need the flexibility to continue to improve upon their own approaches.They have common implementation problems, however, and have expressed theneed for better technical aids, such as data management tools. Third, many state and local governments that already implement UST programsreport a significant effort to provide visible on-site monitoring, whichmeans a constant ``regulatory presence'' is needed to effectively ensurethe regulated community's compliance with UST requirements. A significantenvironmental gain is achieved through the implementation at the locallevel by these individual UST programs. Thus, improving their performancewill produce maximum environmental benefits and ensure the success of theUST program nationwide. Accordingly, EPA believes its implementation effortsshould be focused on serving the network of state and local programs throughlistening to their concerns and helping them solve implementation problemswith tools that improve their programs' effectiveness. Approval of state programs thus becomes a basic competence test to ensurethat the work associated with the implementation of regulatory controlsby the state program will, in fact, cause the needed level of improvementin UST system management by the regulated community. A requisite levelof enforcement authority and technical standards must be ensured, and thereforemust be the focus for approval by EPA. Other program performance and implementationcapability concerns are less of a focus for state program approval andmore of a question of improving implementation of the national UST programover time after states have received program approval. EPA recognizes thatthe nature of the problem and the work involved in effective direct implementationof the regulation by EPA will overwhelm the Agency's capabilities and resources.Accordingly, the strategy for state program approval must focus on ensuringthat a bottom-line level of protection is maintained, but at the same timemust avoid setting requirements that would prevent or discourage the developmentof sound state and local UST programs that should be approved to operate``in lieu of'' the federal program. The aim of state program approval isto develop the state-federal partnership that will allow both parties tofocus on preventing leaking USTs from causing further environmental contamination.<ITAG tagnum="84">III. Today's Rule </ITAG>A. Summary of Today's Rule EPA is promulgating today a final regulation for approval of state undergroundstorage tank programs under section 9004 of RCRA, to be codified at 40CFR Part 281. This regulation establishes criteria for state programs inthe areas of ``no less stringent'' and ``adequate enforcement'' of compliance.The major elements of today's rule are outlined below. In defining ``no less stringent,'' EPA is promulgating criteria in theform of objectives. These objectives are established for seven of the eighttechnical program elements: New UST systems design, construction, and installation;release detection; general operating requirements; upgrading of existingUSTs; release reporting, investigation and confirmation; out-of-serviceUSTs and closure; and release response and corrective action. The objectivefor the element of financial responsibility will be provided by EPA whenthe final technical requirements in this area are provided at a later date.These objectives represent the minimum standard that the state programmust achieve in order to be considered ``no less stringent'' than the federalrequirements. Through these objectives, EPA intends to provide the stateswith the flexibility to develop an administrative approach that best suitsthe needs of the state while ensuring that an adequate level of performanceis achieved in protecting human health and the environment in all statesIn determining ``adequate enforcement'', EPA has defined the minimum authoritiesand procedures a state must have. The state must have authority to inspectrecords, inspect sites, and require monitoring and testing by the owner.The state must also have procedures for inspecting sites and reviewingrecords. The state must have legal authority to obtain a temporary restrainingorder and a preliminary injunction, and to assess or sue to recover penalties.In addition, the state must allow opportunity for public participationin enforcement actions. Finally, the components of a state application for program approval aredescribed in the regulation. These components include: A Governor's transmittalletter; a description of the state program; a description of compliancemonitoring and enforcement procedures; where interim approval is sought,a schedule for final approval; a Memorandum of Agreement, which definesthe roles and responsibilities of EPA and the approved state; an AttorneyGeneral's statement, which certifies to the state's authorities for theeight technical program elements and for enforcement and compliance monitoring;and copies of the applicable state statutes and regulations. EPA believesthat the above requirements ensure that approved state programs meet therequirements set out in RCRA section 9004. B. Strategy for State Program Approval In the April 17 preamble, EPA proposed three options for evaluating whethera state program is ``no less stringent.'' As stated in the proposal, EPA'spreferred approach was to compare the state and federal programs element-by-element.(Section 9004(a) of RCRA establishes those elements that must be includedin a state program in order to receive EPA approval; under today's rulean element is a discrete segment of a comprehensive UST management programthat has an identifiable objective.) EPA believed this option gave thebest combination of flexibility and ease of implementation. On December23, 1987, EPA requested public comment on certain general objectives providedas the criteria for determining the stringency of each program element.Today, the Agency is promulgating these criteria substantially as presentedin the December 23 notice (although the objective for financial responsibilitywill be promulgated at a later date with its associated technical rules),except that they do reflect the points of departure made to the proposedunderlying technical standards (discussed elsewhere in today's <T4>Federal Register</T4>) and public comments on the supplemental notice.As discussed in the December 23 notice, EPA does not believe that the specificfederal requirements in the Part 280 regulations provide the only definitiveand protective approach for UST regulation. In developing the federal technicalstandards, EPA recognized that other approaches would meet EPA's overallperformance objectives. These federal technical standards are by necessitymore detailed and specific than the objectives they are designed to meetbecause the federal regulations must be able to be implemented by the regulatedcommunity and must be enforceable in those states without approved stateprograms. As indicated in today's rule, EPA does not believe that the individualrequirements set forth within the federal program elements should necessarilypreclude states from developing other approaches that will achieve theoverall objectives of performance identified for purposes of state programapproval. The objectives in Subpart C of today's final rule identify the performancestandards for each element that the federal requirements are intended tomeet and that a state program must meet in order to be as stringent asthe federal program. They ensure that state programs meet the basic standardsestablished by the federal program but, at the same time, do not dictatethe methods the states can use in reaching these standards. EPA believesthis approach to state program approval will provide the states with significantflexibility, permit alternative methods of implementation, and still ensurethat state UST programs achieve the same result in protecting human healthand the environment as the federal program. Under section 9004, EPA also must ensure that state programs demonstrate``adequate enforcement'' of compliance with program requirements. EPA proposedthat states demonstrate compliance monitoring and enforcement authoritiesand basic compliance monitoring procedures. In addition, EPA solicitedcomment on whether it should require a demonstration of enforcement responseprocedures. As a result of public comments, the Agency is promulgatingregulations for adequate enforcement that require state programs to demonstratecompliance monitoring and enforcement authorities <T3>and </T3>procedures for implementing those authorities (except in thearea of public participation, where EPA will allow the state to choosebetween specific authorities or procedures). As explained above, EPA seeksto approve a variety of state programs and to encourage states to use innovativeapproaches in all program areas, including monitoring compliance and undertakingenforcement actions. In the near future, EPA will be issuing additionalguidance on ``adequate enforcement'' that will provide examples of acceptablecompliance monitoring and enforcement programs currently being used byseveral states. Today EPA is also clarifying the issue of program scope. In evaluatingthe state's program scope, EPA considered requiring states to include allthe jurisdictional definitions listed in the federal technical standardsrule. EPA concluded, however, that this would be both burdensome and unnecessary.Instead, the state must describe its jurisdiction and regulated populationin the program description to show that its program includes the UST populationthat is covered by the federal program. Broad state authorities are sufficientif, under state law, they cover the same or a greater universe than thefederal program. States may, of course, choose to adopt any of the termsthat are included in the list of definitions in the federal regulationsat 40 CFR 280.12. <ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Analysis of Today's Rule </ITAG>The following sections of this preamble include discussions of the majorissues and address the public comments received in response to the April17 proposed rule and December 23 supplemental notice. EPA has reorganized the proposed rule for two reasons. First, the Agencyis incorporating as Subpart C of today's rule the criteria for ``no lessstringent'' as proposed on December 23, 1987 (52 FR 48638), except forthe criterion for financial responsibility which will be promulgated ata later date along with its supporting technical rules. Second, the Agencyhas clarified the requirements for adequate enforcement as a componentof the state's application. Previously, the adequate enforcement demonstrationwas proposed to be part of the program description. Today, the Agency ispromulgating the adequate enforcement requirements in a separate subpartof the rule. Further explanation of this change can be found later in thispreamble (section IV.B.). For ease of reference, the following preamblediscussion is organized to address each subpart of the rule separately.A. Subpart A_Purpose, General Requirements, and Scope (andSection;andSection;281.10 through 281.12) Section 9004 of RCRA sets forth a number of requirements for state USTprogram approval. Section 9004(a) establishes the elements that must beincluded in a state program in order to receive EPA approval. In orderto correspond with the technical requirements promulgated elsewhere intoday's <T4>Federal Register </T4>(or to be promulgated later, in the case of thefinancial responsibility standards), EPA refers to these program elementsas new UST systems; upgrading of existing UST systems; general operatingrequirements; release detection; release reporting, investigation and confirmation;release response and corrective action; out-of-service UST systems andclosure; and financial responsibility. Section 9004(b) requires that eachof the state program elements be no less stringent than the correspondingfederal program elements for final approval. (A discussion of the Agency'sapproach to determining ``no less stringent'' is provided in Subpart Cof this section of the preamble.) Under section 9004(b) state programsmay receive interim approval as long as certain (but not all) requirementsare no less stringent than the corresponding federal standards. In thepreamble to the April 17 proposal, EPA solicited comments on the requirementthat a state seeking interim approval must have each program element presentin some form before interim approval. No comments were received on thisissue, however. The proposed regulatory language simply provided that astate must have requirements in all the program elements, including theless stringent ones, as a condition of receiving interim approval. Theproposed rule did not specify the type of requirements the states musthave for these other less stringent elements. Therefore, the Agency isclarifying that a state must have at least general statutory authorityfor the less stringent elements. EPA received many comments regarding the program elements necessary forinterim approval. Many commenters expressed concern that some of the mostdifficult program elements to achieve were required to be ``no less stringent''at the time of application in order for a state to qualify for interimapproval. The commenters suggested that EPA change this in the final rule.The Agency agrees with these commenters that the program element requirementsrequired to be no less stringent at the time of application, such as financialresponsibility, may be the most difficult to develop. The Agency, however,has promulgated these no less stringent requirements substantially as proposedbecause they are set forth by statute and cannot be changed through rulemaking.In the proposal, the elements of a state program that must be immediatelyno less stringent were listed as corrective action, financial responsibility,notification, and new tank performance standards. Those elements that couldbe less stringent were listed as leak detection and prevention, recordkeepingfor leak detection, reporting of releases and corrective action, and closure.Since the April 17 proposal, the elements of a program have been reorganizedto parallel the order in the technical standards, and the new tank performancestandards have been divided into standards for upgrading existing UST systemsand general operating requirements as well as standards for new tank design,construction, installation and notification. In order to be no less stringent than the federal program, a state musthave requirements for upgrading of existing UST systems and for generaloperating requirements. For purposes of interim approval of state programs,these elements are considered to be part of the new tank performance standards.Therefore, a state applying for interim approval must have requirementsthat meet the federal objectives for the following elements: New tank design,construction, installation, and notification; upgrading existing UST systems;general operating requirements; release response and corrective action;and financial responsibility. If a state chooses to apply for interim approval, it is accepting the limitationsassociated with it. It must upgrade all less stringent authorities withinthe federal law's established timeframes. EPA acknowledges that this limitationwill make interim approval less attractive to states, and will discouragestates from applying for interim approval. Today's rule, however, providesprocedures for both final and interim approval, including the automaticexpiration of interim approval when a state with interim approval doesnot submit a program revision within the prescribed time periods. Under sections 9004 (a) and (d), the state UST program must also providefor adequate enforcement of compliance. The Agency proposed, and todayis finalizing, requirements mandating certain state legal authorities andprocedures for compliance monitoring and enforcement. These regulatoryrequirements are found in andSection;andSection; 281.40 through 281.43 andare discussed in greater detail later in this preamble.The following section of the preamble explains the parts of the state'sapplication that must be provided to demonstrate coverage of all of theserequirements. B. Subpart B_Components of a Program Application (andSection;andSection; 281.20through 281.25) Today's regulation identifies the components that must be included in thestate program application package submitted to EPA. Many commenters requestedthat the Agency keep the application process as flexible and streamlinedas possible. The Agency attempted to do this, and has simplified the processeven further by designing a standard state application form that will beprovided in a State Program Approval Handbook to be issued before the effectivedate of this rule. The use of this application form is optional and thestate may submit whatever application form that it prefers as long as itmeets the regulatory requirements. As outlined in andSection; 281.20 (a)through (g), the state's application must at least contain the followingbasic parts: (1) A transmittal letter from the Governor of the state; (2)a description of the current state program; (3) a description of compliancemonitoring and enforcement procedures; (4) a schedule for interim approval,where applicable; (5) a Memorandum of Agreement; (6) a statement from thestate Attorney General; and (7) copies of all applicable state laws andregulations. Although for purposes of clarity today's rulemaking separatelyaddresses the Attorney General's statement and the demonstration of adequateenforcement, the state may join the two into one document in the applicationpackage. The Agency had originally proposed that states submit an implementationplan as part of the application for program approval. The proposed implementationplan included: a long term implementation strategy; a schedule for interimapproval; and a Memorandum of Agreement (MOA). One commenter expressed concern that the implementation plan (proposedandSection; 281.22) was redundant and therefore burdensome to require botha program description and an implementation plan. This commenter questionedthe purpose of a long term implementation strategy, interpreting it tosuggest that EPA would conduct detailed oversight of approved state programs.The commenter asked whether the Agency would disapprove a state that didnot achieve the goals laid out in the long-term implementation strategy.The Agency's intention is to conduct oversight in a manner that allowsfor changing circumstances. The original intent of the long-term implementationstrategy was to provide a starting point that the Agency could use to determinethe amount of assistance the state needed to improve its UST program. EPAexpects that a significant amount of this improvement will occur afterstate program approval. As a result, the information provided by the plancan and should be satisfied apart from the approval process, and thus theproposed long-term implementation strategy is unnecessary. Because EPAbelieves that the implementation plan is no longer necessary for approval,and to be consistent with its efforts to streamline the application package,EPA has deleted the proposed requirement for an implementation plan. Theschedule for interim approval and the MOA are now separate applicationcomponents. A brief description of each of the reorganized components in the finalrule is provided below. <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Transmittal Letter (andSection; 281.20(a)) </ITAG>A transmittal letter signed by the Governor of the state must accompanythe original state application. This letter serves to transmit the state'sformal request for UST program approval, and indicates that the Governorhas approved the designated lead state agency for implementation of theUST program. <ITAG tagnum="81">2. Program Description (andSection; 281.21) </ITAG>The program description is intended to provide EPA and the public withbasic information on the extent of the state's effort to manage UST systems.During the formal 180-day application review period, EPA must issue a publicnotice of the tentative decision to approve or disapprove a state programapplication. As part of that notice, EPA must note the availability forinspection by the public of the state program application. The informationin the program description is necessary to ensure that the public is informedof (1) the state's scope and jurisdiction, and (2) the state's plans forimplementing an UST regulatory program in lieu of the federal program.Many commenters asked how EPA would use the resource information in theprogram description. In particular, they were concerned that specific staffingand funding figures would be set by EPA in determining state approval ordisapproval. EPA notes that states have been receiving federal grant fundsfor program development since 1986. These grants, which require matchingstate funds, have enabled states to develop notification systems, obtainnecessary legislation, write regulations and policies, and hire and trainstaff. In addition, most states now have LUST Trust Fund cooperative agreementsthat provide funds for corrective action, staff hiring and training, andenforcement and cleanup activities. Through the grants and cooperativeagreements, and matching state funds, most states have demonstrated sufficientstaffing and management capability for purposes of state program approval.The program description must address several subjects. First, the scopeof the state's UST program is described, including the extent of the state'sjurisdiction and whether the state program is a ``partial'' or ``complete''program. Knowledge of program scope is important for approval because theapproved state program is formally designated to operate in lieu of thefederal program. Thus, the state program must regulate at least the samecategories of UST systems and substances as the federal program to avoidnon-regulation by states of categories of UST systems that Congress intendedto be regulated under the national UST program. The program descriptionalso indicates whether the state's authority extends to Indian lands. Forthose states that do not have authority over their Indian lands, EPA willimplement an UST program on those lands. Although the Agency received no comments on program scope, EPA is providingfurther clarification of its requirements in this area with regard to partialand complete programs. To demonstrate that the state program covers thesame universe as the federal program, the state definitions will be comparedto the following six basic terms, defined in Subtitle I, that EPA believesare essential in defining the scope of the federal UST universe. Thosesix terms, which are defined in Section 9001 of Subtitle I, are: operator,person, release, regulated substances, petroleum, underground storage tank.(Of course, the state may incorporate any of the other terms that are includedin the list of definitions in the federal regulations at 40 CFR 280.12.)The Agency does not require the state to use the exact definitions of theseterms promulgated in the federal regulations. Broadly written state authoritieswill be sufficient, although the Agency may ask for a clarification ifit is not clear that a state definition includes the same jurisdictionas the federal program. For example, rather than defining ``undergroundstorage tank,'' a statute that could regulate any facility with potentialfor release into air, soil or ground water would be sufficient. Section 281.12(a) allows the Administrator to approve either partial orcomplete state programs as specified in section 9004(a) The definitionof a ``partial'' state program is one that regulates either petroleum tanksonly or hazardous substance tanks only. To receive program approval, apartial state program must include within its jurisdiction all of the majorcategories of UST systems that are addressed within the scope of the federalprogram for either petroleum tanks or hazardous substance tanks. For instance,a state program only covering petroleum tanks will not be approved if itdoes not cover retail motor fuel UST systems. The state, however, doesnot have to have immediate jurisdiction over all categories of petroleumtanks. To be approved in such cases, the state must reach an agreementwith EPA in the Memorandum of Agreement on how those tanks not in the statescope will be regulated, and the state also must provide a schedule showingits plan for expanding its jurisdiction so that these tanks will be regulatedby the state. A ``complete'' state program regulates both petroleum and hazardous substancetanks, and the state must have jurisdiction over at least the same categoriesof tanks as the federal program. As discussed above, the state may indicatein the MOA how any tank not in its jurisdiction will be covered as longas it provides a schedule for expanding its jurisdiction Those categoriesof USTs that EPA had proposed to defer but now regulates in the final technicalstandards must be included within the scope of the state program. For example,used oil USTs need to be regulated under state programs. Today's final technical rules do not cover certain UST systems. Becausethe Agency currently has insufficient information to decide whether toregulate these deferred USTs, the question of what (if any) standards areappropriate will be considered in the future. Deferred UST systems, however,are subject to interim prohibition and the release response and correctiveaction requirements under the federal program. UST systems storing fuelfor emergency generators are subject to all but the release detection requirements.Thus, EPA and the state must agree on how to oversee compliance of theregulatory requirements applicable to any deferred USTs in the MOA. Statesmay want to consider including the list of deferred USTs within their statutoryauthority from the start to avoid the necessity for future changes to expandtheir jurisdiction when and if federal regulations for the deferred systemsare eventually published. EPA has exempted by regulation certain other categories of UST systemsentirely, and states will not need to include these systems within theirjurisdictions in order to have adequate program scope for approval. Thecategories of USTs that are deferred and exempted are described elsewherein today's <T4>Federal Register.</T4>Today's rulemaking does not hinder states from implementing a state programthat is broader in scope than the federal program (andSection; 281.12(a)(3)).A state program, for example, may regulate all heating oil tanks, althoughtanks used for storing heating oil for consumptive use on the premiseswhere stored are excluded from the federal UST program. In such cases,the additional scope of coverage is not reviewed by EPA as part of thestate program approval process. In addition, if EPA were asked to provideenforcement assistance, EPA cannot enforce these additional state requirements.On the other hand, in approved states with requirements (such as releasedetection) that are more stringent than the corresponding federal requirements,the more stringent requirements are part of the approved program and arefederally enforceable (andSection; 281.12(a)(3)). Second, this program description will also describe the organizationalstructure of any state and local implementing agencies administering theUST program within a state. The program description must generally identifythe major jurisdictional responsibilities, program operation roles, andlines of communication and authority of these implementing agencies. Copiesof any Memoranda of Understanding (MOUs) or written agreements for coordinationof intra-state responsibilities should be provided. In addition, the program description should identify the number of personscurrently involved in UST program operations, their general functions,and the staff expected to be employed in the near future (if available).State applications should also explain any limitations on hiring or theutilization of existing staff. This information is requested so that thepublic will be informed of operating constraints when the approval applicationis made available to the public through the formal review process. Thisinformation would rarely be a determining factor in assessing the adequacyof the state's program for regulating the UST system universe. In theirresponse to the proposal, many states commented on their current resourceproblems. The Agency will not dictate staffing levels for purposes of stateprogram approval. Third, the program description should explain any plans the state programhas for meeting the estimated future costs of administering the program.There will be no minimum base number used by EPA in approving state programs.All states must have some source of funding independent of federal grantmonies. The Subtitle I federal grants are provided by Congress as seedmoney for use by states to initiate program development, among other things.EPA received many comments about the high costs of implementing UST programsin the states. EPA will not expect states to have all necessary funds availableat the time of application for approval. As with staffing, EPA will approvestates that need to develop additional funding sources, and believes thatfunding is a longer-term issue that is largely separate and apart fromthe state program approval process. In conclusion, EPA does not expect the resource information required inthe program description to result in the disapproval of state programs.Only in the unlikely situation where a state clearly has insufficient staffor funds to implement its program will EPA disapprove the state becauseof inadequate resource levels. The program description, in general, willbe used by EPA and the public as background information that will helpto ensure that a viable state program does exist. Additional guidance onthe program description and the other parts of the application is beingmade available to states in the form of a State Program Approval Handbook,which EPA has developed to help states implement today's rule. In the April 17 proposal, EPA required states to include a descriptionof their compliance monitoring and enforcement procedures in the programdescription. In reorganizing the proposal, EPA is now including compliancemonitoring and enforcement as separate parts of the application. The AttorneyGeneral's statement (andSection; 281.25) should include the state's authoritiesfor compliance monitoring and enforcement. The state's demonstration ofadequate enforcement (andSection; 281.22) will ensure that the state hasappropriate procedures for implementing those authorities. EPA's criteriafor evaluating the adequacy of the state's authorities and procedures areexplained under Subpart D of this preamble. <ITAG tagnum="81">3. Description of Compliance Monitoring and Enforcement Procedures(andSection; 281.22) </ITAG>The description of compliance monitoring and enforcement procedures mustinclude information on the state's procedures for UST population identification,general compliance monitoring, and general enforcement response. More specifically,the implementing agency must have systems for: Updating and maintainingan inventory of the UST population; collecting and maintaining data onviolators and monitoring their subsequent compliance status over time;and exercising legal authorities to take enforcement actions against violators,bring them into compliance, and deter other potential violators. <ITAG tagnum="81">4. Schedule for Interim Approval (andSection; 281.23) </ITAG>States applying for interim approval must include a schedule to propose,finalize, and change the necessary regulations and legislation. The scheduleshould address major milestones in the program development process, forexample, submission of draft legislation, proposal of regulation, and promulgationof final regulations. <ITAG tagnum="81">5. Attorney General's Statement (andSection; 281.25) </ITAG>A fifth component of the state UST program application is a statement fromthe state Attorney General certifying that state laws and regulations provideadequate authority to implement the required elements of an approved program.The Attorney General's statement is the foundation for ensuring that thestate UST program is no less stringent than the federal program. The AttorneyGeneral, or an independent legal counsel for the state, must certify thatthe state laws and regulations provide authority to implement the programdescribed in the application and has legal authorities for compliance monitoringand enforcement that meet the requirements of andSection;andSection; 281.40through 281.43. <ITAG tagnum="81">6. Memorandum of Agreement (andSection; 281.24) </ITAG>The MOA explains EPA's and the lead state agency's respective responsibilitiesfor UST program administration and enforcement. The state staff will developthe draft MOA in close consultation with EPA staff. The MOA will be particularlyimportant if a state is applying for approval of only a partial UST program.In addition, if the state program does not cover the same universe of undergroundstorage tanks as the federal program, the MOA should include an agreementbetween the state and EPA with regard to how those tank systems not coveredby the state program will be regulated. EPA received comments suggesting that local agencies be allowed to signthe MOA. The MOA, however, is signed only by EPA and the lead state agencybecause it is important to have all UST program issues within the statecoordinated by one lead state agency. The need for coordination makes itimpractical for other participating state agencies and all the local authoritiesto sign the MOA. In addition, EPA is only authorized to approve states.<ITAG tagnum="81">7. Copies of All Applicable State Laws and Regulations (andSection;281.20) </ITAG>Copies of all applicable state laws and regulations are essential for EPAto evaluate the state program's scope and technical requirements. Thisinformation will also serve as the basis for establishing a record of thestate laws and regulations regarding USTs in approved states. EPA willcodify state programs by incorporating state laws and regulations by referenceas part of its final approval of the state program. Codification will enableall interested parties to receive notice of which state laws and regulationscomprise the Subtitle I program in approved states. Another reason theAgency codifies state laws and regulations is to clarify the requirementsthat are effective in that state for purposes of federal enforcement. Oncethe state program is approved, it operates in lieu of the federal UST program.Therefore, if EPA were to take an enforcement action in an approved state,it would do so using federal authorities but citing violations of statelaw or regulations.C. Subpart C_Criteria for ``No Less Stringent'' (andSection;andSection; 281.30through 281.36) <ITAG tagnum="81">1. Background </ITAG><T3>a. Summary of public comments. </T3>In the preamble to the April 17proposal (52 FR 12858). EPA solicited comments on three options for determiningwhether technical requirements in states seeking approval are no less stringentthan the corresponding federal standards. Several states commented on theimportance of two goals: Establishing flexible criteria for approval ofstate programs, and clearly identifying the minimum state program requirementsin the final state program approval regulation. EPA recognizes that thesetwo goals may often be in tension, and today's final rule attempts to strikea balance between them through the establishment of clear baseline criteriathat will accommodate effective existing state UST programs to the greatestextent possible consistent with the statute. The Agency's preferred option consisted of comparing the overall requirementswithin each technical program element of the state program to the federalobjective for that element. Whether the state program element was no lessstringent would be determined by its performance in meeting the overallfederal objectives for that element. The two rejected options included(1) a holistic evaluation that would compare the overall stringency ofthe total state program to the total federal program, which would allowtrade-offs between program elements (for example, balancing less stringentfinancial responsibility with more stringent release detection requirements),and (2) a line-by-line comparison of specific state and federal requirements.In the second of these two options, all the federal requirements wouldbe matched by identical or closely similar state requirements for purposesof state program approval. Many comments were received on these options for defining ``no less stringent.''Some commenters felt that only the holistic approach would allow statessufficient flexibility. Some commenters believed that only a line-by-linereview would result in no less stringent state programs. Other commentersagreed with the Agency's preference for the element-by-element approachas a balance between flexibility and certainty. EPA carefully reviewedthese comments and still prefers the element-by-element approach. Thisdecision was based on EPA's intention (1) to develop a state program approvalprocess that will allow states to use alternative approaches in programdevelopment and implementation, and (2) to ensure that state programs meetthe baseline standards established in the federal program to protect humanhealth and the environment. In the preamble to the April 17 proposal, EPA requested comment on whetherto include state approval criteria in regulation or guidance. Many commenterswrote, and the Agency agrees, that including the criteria in regulationwould ensure needed consistency and clarity in approving state programs.Subpart C of today's final rule provides the criteria all states must meetbefore receiving approval, and that EPA will use in judging each stateapplication. In its supplemental <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice of December 23, 1987, EPA proposed criteriafor state program approval in the form of objectives for each of the eighttechnical program elements: New UST system design, construction, installationand notification; upgrading existing UST systems; general operating requirements;release detection; release reporting and investigation; corrective action;out-of-service and closed UST systems; and financial responsibility. Throughthe process of identifying the underlying purpose of the federal technicalrequirements in each program element, EPA developed the proposed federalobjectives. The Agency's own interpretation of administrative and proceduraldetails that were in the technical rule were intentionally left out ofthe federal objectives. These objectives represented the Agency's expectations of what constitutesa no-less-stringent state program. By requiring the state to achieve theobjectives underlying the detailed federal requirements in each elementrather than match each regulatory detail of the federal requirements, EPAprovides a performance-based measure for evaluating programs and recognizesthat the precise details in the federal program are not the only feasibleapproach to UST regulation. By establishing these objectives, EPA alsoprovides a framework for approval that guarantees that each state UST programprovides a minimum level of protection. Many comments were received on EPA's proposal to use the objectives ascriteria for state program approval. Many commenters agreed with the objectivesapproach and felt that objectives would allow development of regulationsappropriate to the geographical characteristics and the profile of theregulated community of each individual state. Some commenters agreed withthe objectives approach, but they suggested that the objectives neededto be more specific in several areas. The Agency has reviewed each of theobjectives and provided greater specificity for several of them. More detailsand guidance are included in today's preamble in the section-by-sectiondiscussion of the objectives for each program element. Other commentersexpressed concern that the objectives not be confused with regulationsand emphasized that the objectives should be viewed by the states as noless stringent review criteria, but not as the model to be copied intostate regulations. EPA agrees with these commenters and, in the followingsection, has provided further guidance on how states should develop regulationsthat will meet the performance goals set out in the objectives. Furthermore,the Agency has developed a Handbook for State Program Approval that willgive more guidance and clarification on meeting the objectives. One commenter discussed the legality of the federal objectives approach.This commenter argued that the approach was illegal, saying that Congressdid not authorize EPA to create a subset of the federal requirements thatwould be used to assess the adequacy of state programs. However, EPA doesnot agree with the commenter who argued that the federal objectives andelement-by-element approach promulgated today are inconsistent with Congressionalintent. First, under today's rule, EPA is not, contrary to the commenter'ssuggestion, picking and choosing a subset of federal requirements by whichto judge the stringency of state UST programs. Instead, the federal objectivesand the element-by-element approach are designed to identify, on a holisticbasis, the environmental performance standards to be achieved by the technicalrequirements in each program area. State programs will be required to achievethe performance standard for each program area rather than match each detailin the federal rule. EPA does not believe that the environmental objectivesapproach set out in today's rule will result in the approval of state USTprograms that are less stringent than the federal UST program. Second, the language of section 9004 is consistent with the federal objectivesand element-by-element approach promulgated in today's rule. Section 9004(b)requires EPA to judge the stringency of state programs by comparing thestate requirements in seven program areas to the corresponding federalstandards. Nothing in the statutory language suggests that a line-by-linecomparison must be made between individual state requirements and correspondingfederal regulations. Rather, paragraphs (a) and (b) of section 9004, whenread together, strongly suggest that the relevant comparison is to thestandard set in each federal program area. Consistency among state programs was an objection raised by many commenterswho are concerned that UST programs that vary from state to state willcreate an excessive compliance burden on those members of the regulatedcommunity operating in more than one state. These commenters believe someflexibility for states is useful, but that uniformity and consistency areequally important. Some commenters pointed out that the federal technicalrule is the result of extensive research and analysis, and they suggestedthat states should be encouraged to adopt the federal standards. EPA does not believe, however, that the specific federal requirements inthe technical rule provide the only definitive approach for protectionof human health and the environment. Many of the specific details of thefederal regulations are necessary to establish requirements that the regulatedcommunity can follow and that the Agency can enforce. State regulationsmust accomplish the same underlying goals that the federal requirementsaim to achieve. If a state chooses to accomplish them using different methodsor administrative procedures than the federal government, however, EPAdoes not believe that that choice should preclude program approval.<T3>b. The technical standards rule and state program approval.</T3> Thedetails provided in the technical rule had to be included so that the regulatedcommunity could understand specifically what had to be done to comply withfederal requirements, and so that the regulations could be enforceableby EPA. Given the nature of the state program approval process, EPA isaware that state program reviews will inevitably entail some comparisonof specific federal and state technical requirements because EPA's technicalrequirements provide a model against which the state program can be measured.The Agency is concerned that requiring such a line-by-line review of stateprograms would result in delays that would be due to issues having littleto do with that actual stringency of the state program or its overall performance.Thus, in order to establish the federal objectives for each program element,EPA distinguished between those requirements in its technical standardsthat are substantive baseline environmental standards from those proceduraland administrative requirements that are necessary to protect human healthand the environment, but are not the only approach for doing so. The formeronly are the basis for state program approval under the ``no less stringent''standard. The latter may also be advised through a variety of approachesestablished by the implementing agency in states that have not yet receivedprogram approval. In the Supplemental Notice, EPA requested comment on whether changes wereneeded in several provisions of the proposed UST technical standards toensure the intended flexibility was available for the approval of statesthat are no less stringent. These changes would allow states to substitutetheir own procedural and administrative requirements for those set forthby EPA in the federal technical standards. Many commenters supported allowingstates additional latitude in this exercise of administrative discretion,specifically as pertains to the development of administrative and proceduralrequirements. In considering this issue, EPA noted that several state andlocal programs are already implementing varying procedural and administrativerequirements that appear to be effective. For the above reasons, EPA hasdecided to integrate this additional decision-making authority into thefinal technical rule. (See the preamble discussion in support of that ruleelsewhere in today's <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice.) <T3>c. Achieving the objective.</T3> In developing a state UST program,EPA believes all states will have the same problem the Agency had in definingsufficiently clear requirements so that the regulated community will understandtheir responsibilities under the rules and can be held to comply with them.UST system owners and operators, the interested public, and state inspectorswill need to know and be able to understand the minimum state requirementsthat apply to the complete operation (from installation to closure) ofall UST systems. However, the final objectives promulgated in today's stateprogram approval regulations do not, and were not meant to, restrict statesto all the specific details of the federal program. EPA intends to allowstates to choose a number of methods that will establish UST programs withclear, understandable requirements. The three major methods are discussedbelow. First, a state may adopt or incorporate by reference today's final technicalregulations. EPA already has some indications that several states planto do this. These technical requirements have been developed with the thoughtthat state programs may use them as the model for their state UST regulations.This approach is the simplest and takes advantage of the effort made byEPA to develop implementable and environmentally protective regulations.Second, a state may develop a different regulatory approach that is, however,analogous to the federal program because it satisfies the performance objectivesfor each program element. EPA's final technical requirements reflect administrativeand technical decisions that do not always have to be duplicated for astate program to be no less stringent in performance. For example, thefederal requirements for new UST system installations mandate the use ofnationally accepted codes. The same performance objective (sound installationsat all new USTs) may be achieved if the state simply requires owners andoperators to use certified installers and the state has a system of licensingor certifying installers that includes adherence to these same codes. Ifa state uses another approach or requires a different method than thatspecified under the federal program, the state must demonstrate that ithas achieved the federal objective within that program element to be acceptedto operate ``in lieu of'' the federal program. In adopting this second approach, the state may develop different regulationsthat provide as specific and clear directions for the owners and operatorsas do the federal requirements. One advantage of this method of rulemakingthat the regulated communities will understand their responsibilities andcan be held to comply with them. Alternatively, a state may choose to promulgate regulations that are moregeneral and then supplement these with detailed policies and guidelinesto instruct the regulated community and the public of its requirementsand procedures for implementing the regulations. These general requirementsmust at least provide the state with authority to hold all UST system ownersand operators responsible for achieving the overall performance goals providedin the objectives, even if the state regulations do not specify exactlyhow to meet each performance goal. This method of rulemaking, however,has a significant disadvantage in that it may increase the state's implementationburden because, to be enforceable, any such general requirements must besupplemented by other state actions that ensure adequate clarificationof how, at a minimum, to achieve the performance goal. Supportive actionscould consist of state administrative policies, technical interpretations,procedures, or guidelines that more clearly establish how the general requirementscan be met. For example, if the state regulations require the use of onlyapproved methods of release detection, then some system for review andapproval of release detection methods must be developed by the state thatwill not result in approval of methods less stringent than those allowedunder the federal program. Several commenters on the December 23 supplemental notice expressed concernsabout this type of state approach and whether state guidelines should besufficient for program approval as opposed to detailed state regulatoryrequirements. Several other commenters felt that procedures and guidelineswould be adequate to demonstrate the adequacy of a state program and thatthis could significantly expedite program approvals, thus allowing thestate to concentrate its resources on cleanups and other necessary activities.Two commenters objected to allowing state guidelines or procedures to replacestate regulations for given requirements. One of these commenters wrotethat regulations and statutes should be required in order to eliminatethe possibility of an informal change in policy or of enforcement problems.The other commenter felt that, in order to provide fair notice and clarityof state methods, such guidelines or procedures must be submitted for publicnotice and comment. In response to those commenters who expressed concerns over whether stateguidelines should be sufficient for purposes of program approval, EPA isclarifying that guidelines are not a substitute for regulations. Guidancedocuments and written policies are not generally enforceable, while regulationsdo have the force of law. However, because EPA's Subtitle I program approvalprocess focuses on whether a state program meets federal performance objectives,an approvable program will not need to have the same level of detail andspecificity in regulations that would be required if the approach to programapproval involved a comparison of individual state requirements with thefederal standards. State requirements that meet the underlying federalobjectives are sufficient for approval in terms of meeting the no lessstringent criteria, irrespective of whether or not they are supplementedwith additional guidance or procedures. However, if the state does notprovide specific enough direction to the regulated community and publicon how to implement the state regulations, the state may not receive approvalfor their UST program. General regulations are difficult to enforce becausethe vagueness and lack of specificity may confuse owners and operatorswho will then be less likely to try and comply with them. Without the abilityto provide adequate enforcement through clear direction, the state programwill not be approvable. One of the criteria for withdrawing approval ofstate programs (andSection; 281.60(1)) is the lack of ability to enforcestate regulations; thus, it is also a criterion for approval. An instanceof where clear direction might be needed occurs in the objective for releaseinvestigation, confirmation and reporting, which says that a state musthave standards that require prompt reporting of confirmed releases. Thestate should define what ``prompt'' is using a number so that the ownersand operators have a clear direction on when such reporting must be doneand so that the state has the ability to determine and then to enforcea violation of this reporting requirement. Therefore, where specific statestandards are not embodied in statute or regulations, the Agency will considerpolicies or guidance documents submitted with the state application forapproval if they are used to support applicable general state regulations.Third, a state can use, for example, a combination of the above approachesthat copies some elements of the federal program in some elements, anduses a different regulatory approach in other program elements. The stateprogram will have met the no less stringent criteria for state programapproval if the regulations within each element achieve the performanceobjectives for those elements.<T3>d. State approaches to ground-water classification. </T3>EPA recognizesthat releases from UST systems located in certain sensitive areas couldpose a greater risk to human health and the environment than other areas.In developing the technical regulations, the Agency considered and requestedcomments on a federal classification approach under which a class or classesof UST systems located in higher-risk areas would be subject to more stringentrequirements than UST systems located in less sensitive areas. After carefulconsideration of this issue, EPA rejected the concept of a federal ground-waterclassification scheme in promulgating the final technical regulations forunderground storage tanks. (This is discussed in more detail in the technicalstandards rule, published elsewhere in today's <T4>Federal Register</T4>.) The Agency strongly believes that the classificationof ground water must be based on highly localized hydrogeological circumstancesand, therefore, that classification should be a state or locally initiatedactivity. The Agency has also concluded that criteria for a national schemeof classification (that is, one that could encompass all the conditionsacross the country) could not be developed and feasibly applied to thenational UST program. A classification approach to regulating UST systems at state or local levels,however, where local environmental conditions are better known, may befeasible and appropriate; such a classification approach could result inimproved environmental management. For example, several states have karstor limestone areas where contamination, once released, is nearly impossibleto contain. In such areas, the state is free to consider whether secondarycontainment with interstitial monitoring could provide enhanced leak detectionand better prevent releases in these sensitive areas. Under today's approachto program approval, the Agency allows, but does not require, states todevelop a classification approach for use in determining whether more stringentleak detection and containment standards should apply to UST systems beinglocated in sensitive or high-risk areas. States that have already developeda classification system may decide to use it to regulate USTs. Under today'sfinal rule for state program approval, the federal objectives must be theminimum requirements in all areas of the state for the program to be determined``no less stringent'' than the federal program; however, states could usea classification scheme to establish standards for certain areas that aremore stringent than those under the federal program. <T3>e. The use of state variances in approved programs. </T3>The Agencysolicited comment on the use of technology- and risk-based variances inthe preamble to the proposed EPA technical standards rule (52 FR 12739and 48641). Technology-based variances are included in the federal technicalregulations (published elsewhere in today's <T4>Federal Register</T4>). For example, the release detection standardsallow owners or operators to use non-specified methods of release detectionif they can demonstrate to the implementing agency, or if the implementingagency otherwise determines, that the alternative method will achieve performancethat is as effective as the allowed methods. Risk-based variances wouldallow less frequent or alternative approaches to release detection of protectedtanks in areas where the risk to human health and the environment is believedto be lower (for example, where ground water is deep and not vulnerableto contamination). The Agency has decided not to include risk-based variancesin the federal technical standards rule because it is the Agency's experiencethat variances based on site characteristics are generally difficult tojustify and implement. In a regulated community the size of the nationalUST community, such a provision would be practically impossible for EPAto implement throughout the nation. Instead, the Agency has developed nationalstandards that set a baseline of protection in all areas. This subject also arises in connection with state program approval. Inthe December 23, 1987 Supplemental Notice (52 FR 48645), the Agency solicitedcomments on whether state programs should be approved if they had a varianceprocedure for owners and operators of petroleum UST systems that allowedalternative and less stringent release monitoring methods in lower riskareas (for example, a state could prospectively classify such lower riskareas). The Agency received some comments in favor and some in oppositionto this approach. In reviewing these comments, the Agency has decided notto allow approval of state programs that do not maintain the minimum federalobjectives in all areas of the state. An important reason for not acceptingthe use of less stringent release detection in ``lower risk areas'' isthe difficulty in clearly establishing what constitutes a lower risk. Severalstate officials commented that they would not be allowed by the publicto ``write-off'' less vulnerable areas. Another commenter questioned thejudgement of classifying lower risk areas based on ground water becausea safety and health hazard (explosive or toxic gases) could be presentat any site with a release. EPA agrees that the final technical standardsfor release detection have been developed to enable the early detectionand minimization of all releases to ensure that present and future groundwater uses are protected at all sites and that all health and safety threatsare avoided. The state requirements can do no less if they are to be consideredno less stringent. For this reason, today's final state program approvalobjectives for no less stringent programs do not allow approval of statesif these states permit less stringent release detection in areas that aredescribed or classified as less vulnerable, whether on a case-by-case orclass basis. If a state program includes a variance procedure, it can still be approvedif the state can demonstrate that its eligibility criteria and proceduresfor reviewing site-specific or more general technology-type variance requestswill ensure no less stringent protection of human health and the environment.However, if a state allows variances, it must agree to issue them onlyin a manner that is no less stringent in protecting human health and theenvironment as the federal program. Terms of this agreement will be specifiedin the MOA included in the state program application. Following is a more detailed explanation of the objectives associated withapproval of no-less-stringent state program elements. <ITAG tagnum="81">2. New UST Systems and Notification (andSection; 281.30) </ITAG>EPA has concluded that an important objective of the national UST programis for all new UST systems to be designed, constructed, installed, andprotected from corrosion in a manner that will prevent releases duringtheir operating life. Also, certain notification requirements should bemet when new USTs are installed. States can achieve this objective in severalways: Adopt the same new UST system requirements found in the federal technicalstandards; require new UST systems to be built and installed in accordancewith nationally recognized industry designs and standards by incorporatingthe applicable national codes and practices directly into state requirements;or adopt such codes by reference into state regulation. The proposed federalobjective for new UST systems has been revised somewhat to reflect changesmade in the final technical standards and public comment received on theproposed objective. The objectives for design and construction have beenmerged with the installation objective to emphasize the common relianceon established codes in today's final technical standards rule. Some commenters were concerned that a general dependence on current nationalconsensus codes would not be protective of the human health and the environment.As discussed in the preamble to the technical standards rule, publishedelsewhere in today's <T4>Federal Register</T4>, EPA does not agree. The Agency's analysis ofthese industry codes and practices, public comments on the proposal, andnew information on the causes of releases from UST systems has led to theconclusion that implementation of these nationally recognized codes willprotect human health and the environment. EPA notes that several of thesecodes for new UST system design, construction, and installation have beenrevised and improved since the publication of EPA's proposed technicalrequirements on April 17, 1987. Another commenter was concerned that state requirements adopting currentindustry codes will not reflect future improvements in technology whenthey occur. The Agency believes the current industry codes and standardsare already protective of human health and the environment. If a stateadopts current codes and those codes are later updated and improved inresponse to new knowledge and technological developments, the state maydecide to adopt the revised code, but it will not generally be requiredto do so for purposes of program approval. They may need to submit programrevisions in the future, however, if the federal technical standards arerevised based on a new code. One commenter suggested that EPA specify which industry standards wereacceptable. The commenter believed that EPA should not assume that allstandards developed by all national groups were adequate. For each elementin which codes have been developed, the final federal technical standardslist the appropriate codes that may be used for purposes of compliance.The federal objective concerning spill and overfill equipment (andSection;281.30(b)) requires that the state program ensure that all owners and operatorsof new UST systems install equipment to prevent spills and tank overfills.In addition, when tanks are upgraded, such equipment must be installedas part of the upgrade. The proposed objective (andSection; 281.32(b)) wasmodified to reflect changes in the final technical rule. The federal requirementfor spill and overfill equipment was originally contained in Subpart C,General Operating Requirements. In today's final technical standards rule,this requirement for equipment has been moved to Subpart B, UST SystemDesign, Construction, Installation and Notification. To remain consistentwith this formatting change in the federal technical standards rule, thefinal objective for spill and overfill equipment has been included withthe objectives for New UST Systems in the state program approval rule (andSection;281.30(b)). To be no less stringent in this area, the state must have requirementsthat all new tanks must have spill and overfill equipment (except as notedbelow). Equipment to provide such protection includes small catchment basinsfor spills, and alarms, automatic flow restrictors, or shutoff devicesfor overfill prevention. A provision has been added to clarify that statesdo not have to require spill and overfill equipment on tanks that are manuallyfilled through the addition of less than 25 gallons of product at a time(for example, used oil storage collection tanks at service stations thatare manually filled in small volumes). This change recognizes the limitedequipment exemption that has been added to the final EPA technical standardconcerning spill and overfill equipment.The proposal allowed state substitution of requirements on transportersin lieu of spill and overfill equipment. Several commenters were concernedthat this provision could interfere with current regulations set forthby the U.S. Department of Transportation, and that they would also notprovide sufficient spill and overfill protection. EPA agrees that thisproblem cannot be adequately solved by procedures required on the transportersalone and that requiring UST preventive equipment is more protective. Therefore,the final objective has been revised to no longer allow for substitutionof procedural requirements on transporters in lieu of spill and overfillequipment on the UST system. The federal objective concerning the notification requirement (andSection;281.30(c)) is that the state program ensures that all owners of new USTsystems notify the implementing agency of the UST's existence. Under section9002 of RCRA, this notification requirement already has been implementednationally for existing UST systems. Owners of existing and new UST systemswere required to notify the designated state agency of the existence, age,size, type, use and location of their USTs beginning May 1986. Therefore,states may be approved if they only require owners and operators of newUST systems to notify the state agency because notifications of existingUSTs have already taken place under existing federal authorities. Although it was not included as a requirement for state program approval,the April 17 proposal solicited comment on whether approved states mustrequire updated notifications from owners and operators of existing USTs(52 FR 12857). Updates of existing notifications, however, are not mandatedby federal law and are not part of the final federal technical requirements.In general, commenters concurred with the decision not to include updatingas a state program approval requirement, although several pointed out thatsuch updated information may be useful to the state. A few commenters expressedtheir belief that states should be required to update existing tank notificationprecisely because this data is useful to the state for enforcement purposes.Although some states may choose to have notification updates as part oftheir program, EPA is not requiring collection of this information forpurposes of state program approval because it is not required under thefederal program. Another commenter pointed out that the federal notification form was proposed(on April 17) to be revised to include a new compliance status sectionthat must be filled out by new UST system owners and operators. The commenterquestioned why this additional information was not included in the objectivefor new UST systems in approved state programs. While this informationwill be useful to the implementing agency, EPA is not convinced that sucha requirement is necessary to achieve the federal objective for new USTsystems. The new UST system compliance checklist is to assist in compliancemonitoring, and will not act as a substantive performance standard. Becausethe additional information is an enforcement tool rather than a new USTsystem standard, it is not required as part of the objective for new USTsystems. Thus, states will be left with the discretion as to whether ornot they desire to use the notification form to collect this additionalinformation on new UST installations for purposes of compliance monitoring<ITAG tagnum="81">3. Upgrading Existing UST Systems (andSection; 281.31) </ITAG>An important national objective is to ensure that unprotected steel USTsystems are either upgraded or replaced within 10 years. This phase-inof protected tank systems is expected to prevent numerous leaks that wouldotherwise occur in the future due to corrosion of unprotected steel. Theupgrading of existing UST systems ensures that existing USTs meet essentiallythe same standards of protection as new UST systems. Thus, by 1998, allUST systems must prevent releases due to corrosion, and spills or overfills.This 10-year schedule, however, does not include installation of releasedetection devices, which must be completed within 5 years according tothe release detection objective at andSection; 281.33(b). This 10-year goal may be achieved in two general ways. First, the statemay develop a phase-in schedule that will bring all the USTs into complianceincrementally during the 10-year period. The phase-in schedule could bebased on the age of the tank, ground-water sensitivity, county, zip codeor any other factor chosen by the state. Second, the state may establishthe same baseline goal as the federal requirements (1998), without specifyinga detailed phase-in schedule. The proposed objective for upgrading existing UST systems included a provisionthat allowed states to demonstrate in the state program approval applicationhow other state requirements will achieve this federal goal without anexplicit 10-year deadline. In the Supplemental Notice, EPA described whatsuch a demonstration might consist of and requested comments on this approach.While several commenters encouraged the use of this more flexible approach,other commenters objected that the 10-year deadline was not simply a goalto work toward but that it was a requirement that must be achieved. Thelanguage in the proposed objective created confusion on this point. Thediscussion of this objective in the Supplemental Notice further raisedcommenters' concerns because it said that states could establish otherrequirements that might reasonably achieve the same general objective byprompting most unprotected tanks to be upgraded. One commenter asked fora definition of ``most tanks.'' Another commenter argued that if EPA'sbest judgment dictates that tanks should be upgraded within 10 years (asrequired in the federal technical standards), then a state program thatdoes not accomplish this is not as stringent as the federal program. The Agency has considered these arguments and has deleted the provisionthat allows a demonstration of how upgrading will be achieved without a10-year deadline. An important goal in the federal technical standardsrule is for all existing UST systems storing regulated substances to berequired either to upgrade to new tank standards within 10 years throughretrofit or replacement, or be permanently closed. Most commenters to theproposed technical standards rule supported this requirement (for furtherdiscussion, see the Preamble to the final federal technical standards ruleelsewhere in today's <T4>Federal Register</T4>). The Agency was concerned that the provisionin the proposed objective would lead states to believe that a time periodgreater than 10 years for upgrading was allowable. In addition, it wasunclear what information would provide an adequate demonstration. The Agencywas concerned that the interpretations would vary widely on what was sufficientfor the state program to be approved and guidance on the subject has proveddifficult to provide. For all these reasons, the Agency has deleted theproposed provision that allowed the state to demonstrate how the goal ofupgrading existing USTs within 10 years would be achieved without a deadline.<ITAG tagnum="81">4. General Operating Requirements (andSection; 281.32) </ITAG>An important objective of the final EPA technical standards is the preventionof releases through the proper operation and maintenance of the UST system.EPA has concluded that the improper operation of UST systems can resultin significant releases into the environment. To achieve the objectiveof the corresponding federal requirements in this program element, a stateprogram needs to demonstrate that the risk of operation-related releasesis minimized. This objective consists of five different provisions: (1)The use of procedures to prevent overfills and spills during transfer;(2) the maintenance of corrosion protection mechanisms; (3) ensuring thecontinued compatibility of the regulated substance stored with the USTsystems; (4) ensuring only sound upgrades and repairs, which are performedin accordance with nationally-recognized practices; and (5) maintenanceof recordkeeping necessary to demonstrate recent facility compliance.The final technical standards require that spills and overfills be preventedthrough the use of proper procedures during product transfer (andSection;281.32(a)). In response to one commenter's concern that the proposed objectivein this area was not specific enough regarding proper transfer procedures,the final rule now requires that steps be taken to ensure that the spacein the tank is sufficient to receive the volume being transferred and thatthe transfer operation is monitored constantly. This change makes it clearerthat the Agency's intent in this aspect of the objective is consistentwith the final technical standards. The objective concerning the operation and maintenance of corrosion protectionhas been modified in response to commenters' concerns (andSection; 281 32(b)).One commenter correctly pointed out that the proposed objective, whichstated that UST systems must ``be operated and maintained to prevent releasesdue to corrosion for the operating life of the UST systems if they havebeen equipped with corrosion protection'', was not specific enough to ensurethat states achieved the same performance goals as the corresponding EPAtechnical standards. Thus, the revisions to the final wording of the provisionclarify EPA's intent that procedures for operation and maintenance of corrosionprotection be carried out by someone knowledgeable and trained in corrosionprotection. The goal is to ensure that the necessary protection is in placeand operating properly. A note has been added for further guidance to suggestthat state requirements in this area build on several existing nationalcodes (such as those established by the National Association of CorrosionEngineers). State programs must hold owners and operators responsible for ensuringcompatibility between tank systems and their stored substances (andSection;281.32(c)). EPA has concluded that incompatibility can result in releasesdue to structural deterioration of tanks or piping. EPA recommends theuse of certain industry codes for ensuring the compatibility of alcohol-blendedfuels with fiberglass tanks. For purposes of program approval, a generalstate requirement in this area would be sufficient (as it is in EPA's finaltechnical standard in andSection; 280.32). The general operating objective includes a provision that addresses USTsystem upgrading and repairs (andSection; 281.32(d)). An additional requirementthat has been added to this objective is that the system be found structurallysound before upgrades or repairs can take place. EPA has concluded thatsuch an assessment is an important performance objective because all repairand upgrade technologies depend on the structural soundness of the existingsystem. Today's final technical standards for upgrading and repairs emphasizethis initial assessment of tank system soundness before a repair or upgrading.The change to the federal objective similarly reflects this clarificationof the corresponding federal requirements. This change also is made torespond to concerns raised by some commenters on the December 23 SupplementalNotice that the proposed objective appeared to ignore the emphasis on aninitial assessment that was included in the proposed (and now final) technicalstandard concerning repairs. To clarify the proposed objective, EPA has revised the language for thefinal rule to ensure that states mandate that such assessments are conducted.There are several approaches for determining the structural integrity oftanks, for example, internal inspections, vacuum tests, and tightness testing.To meet this objective, a state may allow several approaches, mandate aspecific test technology, or simply require that a general performancelevel be achieved. This objective also ensures that upgrades and repairs are conducted ina manner that will prevent future releases for the remaining operatinglife of the UST system. Under today's final technical rules, a steel tankthat is structurally sound may be upgraded or repaired by use of an internallining alone (without cathodic protection), by retrofitting with a cathodicprotection system, or both. FRP tanks must be repaired by the tank manufacturer'sauthorized representative or in accordance with national codes EPA's finaltechnical standards require the use of applicable national codes and standardsto ensure sound repairs and upgrading practices. Thus, the stringency ofthe state requirement will be considered in light of these existing nationallyrecognized practices. The final provision of the general operating objective establishes thatstate programs must require UST owners and operators to maintain recordsof monitoring, testings, repairs and closure sufficient to demonstraterecent facility compliance status, except that repair and upgrading recordsmust be kept for the operating life of the facility (andSection; 281.32(e)).As discussed in greater detail in the preamble to the final technical standardsrule (elsewhere in today's <T4>Federal Register</T4>), the Agency has concluded that some recordkeepingrequirements are necessary to establish the recent compliance status ofthis large regulated community because regular reporting and frequent androutine inspections at all sites are not feasible. One commenter requestedthat EPA specify extensive recordkeeping requirements for state programs,including site plans and tank tests. EPA encourages states to require thatowners and operators keep site plans on file as they could be useful. However,EPA will leave this administrative requirement, as well as other specificsof recordkeeping, to the discretion of the state according to the needsof its particular UST program. In evaluating whether a state program is no less stringent in this area,the Agency will consider four points pertaining to the state's recordkeepingrequirements. First, the state must require records addressing the sameareas of the program that are mandated under the federal technical standards.These areas are listed in the objective and include release detection monitoring,corrosion protection testing, testing and certifications for repairs andupgraded UST systems, and site assessments at closure. Second, the stateprogram must require records to be retained long enough to demonstraterecent facility compliance. EPA has designed the final technical standardsto represent a minimum paperwork burden that will still enable an inspectorto assess current facility compliance during an on-site inspection. Theserequirements in the technical standards rule may provide a guide for statesto follow in developing their own requirements. Third, the state's requirements must ensure that documentation of complianceis sufficiently detailed to enable an inspector to evaluate compliancein the areas mentioned above. For example, site assessment test resultsthat demonstrate the condition of the site at closure must be available.Finally, the state program must require that all on-site records be madeimmediately available when requested by representatives of the state agency,or provided promptly to the inspector when they are stored off-site. Ifa state requires routine reporting, or collects and maintains this informationitself, then an owner and operator may not need to maintain records on-sitein order for the state program to meet this objective. <ITAG tagnum="81">5. Release Detection (andSection; 281.33) </ITAG>The detection of releases from new and existing UST systems is an importantobjective in the federal program. In the preamble to the December 23 SupplementalNotice (52 FR 48645), EPA discussed five major provisions of the performanceobjective for release detection. These provisions included requirementsfor: (1) The phase-in of release detection requirements; (2) new petroleumtank systems; (3) the applicability of release detection to both tanksand piping, and the capability of detection methods used; (4) new hazardoussubstance UST systems; and (5) all existing UST systems. EPA received numerous comments on these proposed objectives, as well asthe April 17 proposed technical requirements for release detection. Thecomments related to the proposed objective are addressed below, while thecomments on the federal technical standards for release detection are discussedin the preamble to the federal technical standards rule published elsewherein today's <T4>Federal Register</T4>. The final technical standards for release detectionhave been revised to reflect public comment as well as new informationavailable to the Agency since proposal regarding the causes of releasesfrom UST systems. These changes in the federal technical rule are summarizedin Section IV.D. of the preamble to that final rule package. First, more frequent tank tightness testing (annual) of unprotected tanksis required during the 10-year upgrading period. Second, less frequentmonitoring of new and upgraded tanks is allowed for 10 years from installationor upgrade, or by 1998 if it is later, at which point release monitoringmust become more frequent. Third, the schedule for phase-in of releasedetection over 1 to 5 years at existing tanks will be based on age; andfourth, release detection is phased-in sooner on pressurized piping systems(within 2 years). EPA has modified the substance and organization of the proposed releasedetection objective in today's final rule as a result of these changesand the reformatting of the final technical standards. The changes in theformat for the final release detection objective resulted in a sectionfor: General methods, phase-in of the requirements, requirements for petroleumtanks and piping, and requirements for hazardous substance USTs. The followingdiscussion addresses the changes to the federal objective for release detectionin greater detail.<T3>a. General methods (andSection; 281.33(a)).</T3> An important provisionof the release detection objective is for state programs to ensure thatonly those methods are used that can detect releases from UST systems aseffectively as methods allowed under the federal program. The technicalstandards for release detection specify general performance and designrequirements for several different detection methods to ensure reliabledetection of releases. Accordingly, the proposed objective for state programsgenerally required the use of methods that are as effective as the methodsallowed under the federal standards, and that the method be designed, installed,operated and maintained so that releases are detected. A few commenters expressed concern that this provision of the proposedobjective was vague and should include some of the details from the proposedtechnical standards concerning allowable methods. For example, one commenterexpressed concern that the wording of the proposed objective would allowstates to use different types of interstitial monitoring, and that suchflexibility would place an undue burden of oversight and evaluation onthe state implementing agency. EPA does not agree that the objective must include the same details containedin the final federal technical standards. As stated earlier, state programsdo not have to mandate exactly the same requirements as the correspondingfederal standards in order to be no less stringent. The state program musthave an approach, however, that will ensure at least an equivalent levelof performance as the federally-allowed methods. EPA plans to issue guidessoon concerning the performance and correct use of various generic methodsof release detection that should assist states in developing their ownguidelines and evaluations of release detection methods The provision of the proposed objective regarding general methods has beenrevised to reflect changes made in the final release detection technicalstandards. First, wording has been added to andSection; 281 33(a)(1) clarifyingthat release detection methods must be able to detect releases from anyportion of the UST system ``that routinely contains the regulated substance.''EPA interprets this phrase to include all underground delivery piping andthe tank vessel itself (except for the very top of the tank, which is protectedby overfill prevention requirements). This clarification ensures that severalviable methods of release detection are not disallowed (for example, in-tanklevel gauges that cannot detect releases due to loose bung hole covers,or double-walled tanks that do not cover the full 360-degree circumferenceof the tank). The proposed objective for release detection specified that, in general,the method of release detection chosen must be capable of detecting a releaseof regulated substances before it migrates beyond the excavation area.This phrase, ``before it migrates beyond the excavation area,'' was intendedto be the performance goal that the state requirements must meet. The Agencyrequested comments on this language in the Supplemental Notice, specificallyon what types of state requirements would ensure a similar level of performanceas the federally-allowed methods. The Supplemental Notice discussed theplacement of ground-water monitoring wells as an example of possible flexibilityin specific requirements. EPA noted that state regulations permitting ground-watermonitoring wells to be located outside the excavation zone might be acceptableif another method was combined with the wells. One commenter pointed toa contradiction between this example and the performance requirement, andasked for clarification. The phrase ``before it migrates beyond the excavation area'' has been deletedin the final objective for release detection because it precludes the useof some acceptable out-of-tank methods of release detection that are sometimesinstalled just beyond the excavation zone, such as ground-water monitoringwells. The state should be able to allow the use of the same release detectionmethods that are allowed under the federal technical standards. EPA hasdeleted the original phrase and added a second sentence that specifiesthe factors that must be considered when comparing other release detectionmethods against the methods approved in the federal technical standards.This change alters the basic performance goal that the state requirementson release detection methods must achieve; the new performance goal consistsof a comparison with the federally-allowed methods. The federal technicalstandards allow six methods of release detection and also allow any othermethods that meet either of two more general release detection requirements.One of these requirements is a release detection rate of 0.2 gallons perhour (andSection; 280.43(h)(i)). The alternative is a comparison test ofthe effectiveness of the proposed method against the first six methods,which consists of a demonstration by the owner and operator for the implementingagency (andSection; 280.43(h)(ii)). Therefore, the language in the finalrelease detection objective for state program approval is intended to allowthe state to permit the use of any of the federally-approved methods aswell as any methods that the state determines are as effective as the federally-approvedmethods. Second, andSection; 281.33(a)(2) has been revised to specify that all methodsmust be properly calibrated in addition to being designed, installed, operated,and maintained to detect releases. This minor change makes the objectiveconsistent with the approach in the final technical standards. Third, wordinghas been added that makes it clear that all methods must be implementedin accordance with the capabilities of the method. This change reflectsan amendment to the technical standards to clarify that a method not onlyhas to be capable of detecting small releases but must also be operatedin a manner that will make use of those capabilities.<T3>b. Phase-in of requirements (andSection; 281.33(b)). </T3>As discussedin the preamble to the December 23 Supplemental Notice, EPA has also concludedthat to be no less stringent, a state program must ensure that releasedetection is applied at all UST systems as rapidly as required under thefederal program. The Agency is convinced that numerous existing UST systemsare now leaking and, therefore, an important performance objective forstate programs is quick detection to enable initiation of release responseand corrective action. The proposed objective allowed states the flexibilityto complete this phase-in in different ways providing that it is completedas rapidly as under the federal technical standards rule. Several commenterssupported this approach. Several others, however, expressed the beliefthat EPA should not permit any variation from the proposed federal technicalstandards with regard to phase-in dates for purposes of state program approval.These commenters were concerned that the proposed objective would allowany state phase-in method to be approved and did not clearly identify evaluationcriteria for determining acceptable state phase-in approaches. In today's final technical standards rule. EPA has decided to phase inrelease detection over 1 to 5 years at all UST systems following a specificschedule that is based on the age of the UST system. This approach wassuggested by numerous commenters. Although EPA recommends that a similarapproach be used by state programs, the Agency has decided to retain flexibilityin the final objective to continue to allow states to use other phase-inapproaches. EPA believes numerous other reasonable approaches are possibleincluding the phase-in of release detection sooner at UST systems locatednear drinking water wells. The key to meeting this federal objective isto ensure that release detection is scheduled to be completed at all USTsystems before the end of the 5-year phase-in period. In response to some commenters' concern about the clarity of this objective,the final objective has been revised to mandate that states provide ``anorderly schedule that completes'' the phase-in within 5 years. Althoughstates do not have to use the criterion of age to be no less stringentin performance, they must provide a phase-in schedule that results in significantsegments of the regulated community using release detection methods wellbefore the end of the 5-year time period. Approaches that allow a majorityof the regulated community to wait until the end of the 5-year period wouldnot be accepted as an ``orderly schedule.'' Allowing the major portionof the regulated community to wait until the end of the period will resultin serious noncompliance because much of the regulated community will waituntil the last minute to apply release detection. A scarcity of releasedetection services would then result when everybody begins to demand theseservices at the same time, and releases will continue to go undetectedin the interim. EPA has also clarified andSection; 281.33(b)(2) to require that each state'sphase-in approach mandate that either release detection be applied or thesystem be closed. The objective for release detection proposed on December23 did not include a conditional requirement to close the UST system ifthe owner or operator chose not to apply release detection. One commenterargued that the requirement to close is a powerful incentive to ensurethat release detection takes place, and therefore, is important to theachievement of the objective. This commenter pointed out that such a requirementwas proposed in the federal technical standards and is important to ensurethat facilities are not allowed to operate in noncompliance (without releasedetection) after the phase-in period is over EPA agrees with this commenterand has revised this objective to include this requirement. The final objective has been changed also by adding the requirement thatrelease detection methods that can detect a release within an hour mustbe applied at all pressurized underground piping within 2 years of theeffective date of the federal requirements. This change reflects the increasedstringency of the final technical standards concerning release detectionfor pressurized piping. EPA believes that an important performance objectiveis that state programs ensure that automatic flow restrictors or shutoffequipment or other hourly monitoring methods (such as vapor monitoring)with alarms be applied to all pressurized piping as rapidly as is requiredunder the corresponding federal requirements. The Agency has concludedthat pressurized piping without such release detection equipment posesa serious threat to human health and the environment. <T3>c. Requirements for petroleum tanks (andSection; 281.33(c)). </T3>Anotherimportant aspect of the proposed release detection objective was for allrelease detection methods to be applied at least monthly, except that for10 years, infrequent tightness testing combined with monthly inventorycontrol could be used. As discussed in the preamble to the proposed technicalstandards, EPA believes that repeated monitoring on a frequent to continuousbasis is the first step toward minimizing threats posed by releases fromUST systems, particularly existing systems unprotected from corrosion.EPA did not receive any comments on this aspect of the release detectionobjective except that one commenter requested further clarification ofthe proposed frequency requirements. However, three important changes intoday's final technical standards have resulted in a revision to this provisionof the final objective in andSection; 281.33(c), and they are discussed below.First, the final technical standards for release detection have been revisedto allow tightness testing every 5 years combined with monthly inventorycontrol for the first 10 years after the tank is installed or upgraded,or until 10 years from the effective date of today's requirements, whicheveris later. The final objective has been revised to reflect these changesin andSection; 281 33(c)(1). After 10 years, monthly monitoring must be conducted,even at protected petroleum tanks equipped with spill and overfill preventiondevices. Again, this change reflects the performance requirements in EPA'sfinal technical standards. Second, the final release detection standards have been changed to requireeither monthly monitoring or annual tightness testing in combination withmonthly inventory control for all existing petroleum tanks unprotectedfrom corrosion or not equipped with spill and overfill prevention devices.The final objective has been revised to reflect these changes in andSection;281.33(c)(2). Third, all the final release detection technical standards have been reorganizedand the release detection objective has been changed accordingly to reflectthis. Thus, today's final objective highlights more clearly the requirementsfor petroleum tanks by featuring them in new andSection; 281.33(c).<T3>d. Requirements for petroleum piping (andSection; 281.33(d)).</T3> Anotherimportant aspect of the release detection objective is monitoring of theunderground piping attached to the tank. In the proposed objective (aswell as the proposed federal technical standards for release detection),all underground piping had to meet the same release detection requirementsas the tanks except that new pressurized lines without continuous monitoringhad to use automatic shutoff equipment. Today's final objective concerningrelease detection for the piping reflects several changes that are dueto revisions made to the final technical standards. First, to be consistent with the final technical standards, the provisionin the objective pertaining to release detection for petroleum piping hasbeen separated from the one for the tanks. This change is intended to clarifythe different performance objectives that must be achieved for the piping.In addition, monthly inventory control as a method of release detectionis not sufficient to meet this requirement because it is not as effectiveas any of those methods allowed under the federal technical standards (seeandSection; 281.33(a)(1)). Second, a phrase has been added to clarify that only underground pipingthat routinely contains petroleum must have release detection. State requirementsdo not have to address release detection for fill pipes and vent pipesto be considered no less stringent. Third, the objectives for pressurized lines have been made clearer to indicatethat all such lines must be equipped with release detection that is ableto detect a release within an hour by restricting or shutting off flowor sounding an alarm. In addition to hourly release detection equipment,monthly monitoring must be applied to pressurized piping or annual tightnesstests must be conducted. Reflecting clarifications of the final technicalstandards, these changes indicate the Agency's increased concern aboutthe threats posed by pressurized piping. Fourth, the objective for suction piping has been changed to make clearthat these types of lines, as in the federal technical standards, mustbe tightness tested every three years. Two possible exceptions exist. Testingevery three years is not necessary if a monthly method of release detectionis in use, for example, release detection that already applies to the tank.The other possible exception to testing every three years is in the casewhere the suction piping system is designed so that product always drainsback into the tank when the suction is released and the design of the pipingis such that an inspector can immediately determine the integrity of thepiping system. These types of piping systems generally have an easily accessiblecheck valve near the dispenser that an inspector can test to identify ifthe system is working correctly. Further discussion on the technical aspectsof the design of a suction piping system may be found in the preamble tothe final technical standards rule (section IV.D.) and in the preambleto the proposed technical standards rule (52 FR 12745). <T3>e. Requirements for hazardous substance UST systems (andSection; 281.33(e)).</T3>The final provision of the release detection objective is release detectionfor hazardous substance UST systems. The proposed objective specified thatall existing systems must meet the same requirements as existing petroleumUST systems, and that all new UST systems must use secondary containmentand interstitial monitoring unless the state approves another method. EPAis today promulgating the final objective substantially as proposed. Theobjective has been reformatted, however, to add clarity and to reflectthe organization of the final technical standards rule. First, the release detection objective for hazardous substances for bothnew and existing UST systems has been consolidated into one two-part objectiveThe objective for existing hazardous substance UST systems (andSection; 281.33(e)(1))is followed by the objective for new ones (andSection; 281.33(e)(2)). Thewording in the objective for existing UST systems refers back to the objectivesfor petroleum UST systems for purposes of simplicity, but the meaning ofthe requirement is unchanged from the proposal. Second, a couple of minor wording changes have been made to the proposedlanguage concerning the objective for new UST systems in andSection; 281.33(e)(2).The deletion of the ``no less stringent'' language and the substitutionof wording that holds variance approvals only to methods that are ``aseffective as'' methods already allowed under the state program is intendedto clarify that the performance of the methods sought under a variancemust be judged relative to other methods allowed by a state program. In addition, an effective clean up technology must be identified for thehazardous substances being stored in the tank. This language has been addedto simply make the objective consistent with the revisions to the varianceallowed in the federal technical standards rule. This information on cleanup technologies will allow the state to make a more informed decision whenevaluating requests for a variance from the secondary containment requirement.In some cases this may lead the state to determine that existing correctiveaction methods are unsatisfactory even though release detection technologyfor the hazardous substance is available. <ITAG tagnum="81">6. Release Reporting, Investigation, and Confirmation (andSection; 281.34)</ITAG>The objective of this program element is to ensure that all suspected belowground releases are promptly investigated and all confirmed releases areimmediately reported, including all spills and overfills that are not containedand cleaned up. EPA will consider the following points in determining whethera state program is no less stringent than the corresponding federal programrequirements. First, the state must require the investigation of all suspected releases.The final federal technical standards allow the owner and operator to double-checkdata and retest and repair release detection equipment before determiningthat an unusual condition or signal at the site signifies a suspected release.The discovery of released regulated substances at the UST site or in thesurrounding area must, at a minimum, be a trigger for investigating a suspectedrelease. EPA notes that many different methods are being used already toinvestigate suspected releases and they can be tailored to site-specificconditions. Another aspect of this objective is that the state requirements will needto establish how and when a suspected release is determined to be a confirmedrelease and corrective action must begin. It is important that state requirementsfor release investigation be clear on this point. Ambiguity on how a suspectedrelease must be investigated and when it is confirmed may result in delayson the part of the owner and operator in initiating clean up actions. Becausesuch delays could increase the threat to human health and the environment,vague state requirements would be less stringent that the federal technicalstandards rule, which establishes a failed tightness test or a findingof significant contamination in the bottom of the UST system excavationzone as two separate ways of confirming a release. A state program mustensure that unintended delays in reporting confirmed releases that mayoccur as a result of uncertainty are avoided. Second, the state must require a prompt investigation of all suspectedreleases. The federal technical standards specify completion of the investigationwithin 7 days (or another time period specified by the implementing agency).In contrast, the federal objective for state program approval purposessimply requires ``prompt'' investigation because EPA believes the precisedefinition of what constitutes a prompt investigation should be left tothe discretion of the states within reason. EPA selected 7 days as a timelimit in the final technical standards because the Agency believes thatthe type of investigation (a tightness test or initial site investigation)that is being required at the federal level can be arranged and carriedout within that time period. The ability to investigate a site, however,can depend on the site and on the availability of the existing servicecommunity. Therefore, a state that allows some additional time for completinginvestigations may still be considered no less stringent. For example,a state that requires more intensive or complex investigations may needmore than 7 days to complete. EPA intends to be flexible in interpretingthe promptness of a required state investigation in consideration of thesefactors. However, EPA also notes that if a state program allows ownersand operators to carry out the same or similar investigations as requiredby EPA significantly beyond the 7 days (for example, 30 days), that stateprogram is not likely to meet the objective with regard to prompt investigation.Third, EPA has concluded that spills and overfills are generally identifiablethrough visual observations and that remedial action should be taken assoon as possible after such a discovery. The federal technical standardmandates that all spills be contained and cleaned up, and reported whenthey are not cleaned up or when they are greater than certain volumes (forexample, greater than 25 gallons for petroleum releases). To meet the federalobjective in this area, the state must require that spills and overfillsbe cleaned up. Those spills and overfills that are not completely cleanedup must also be reported so that the state can ascertain whether furthercorrective action is necessary. The Agency is aware, however, of statesthat have varying levels for automatically reporting aboveground releasesUnder today's rule, a state with higher reporting levels than those underthe final EPA technical standards (for example, Florida's requirement forreporting of all spills or overfills of petroleum greater than 100 gallons)can be considered no less stringent if two conditions are satisfied: (1)The state mandates that the unreported spills be completely contained andcleaned up; and (2) the state has requirements that identify the specificsteps an owner and operator must take to ensure unreported spills and overfillsare contained and cleaned up in a manner that will protect human healthand the environment. (For example, Florida has several requirements inits regulations that will result in complete containment and removal ofall released product, including contaminated soils.)EPA has chosen a reporting threshold of 25 gallons because it feels thatits requirements are sufficient to guide owner and operator activitiesfor spills under this amount, but that spills larger than 25 gallons mustbe reported so that further and more specific guidance can be obtainedby the owner and operator. However, if state regulations are more specificthan the federal regulations and provide more extensive guidance for howto carry out a clean-up at the sites with larger spills or overfills, thenEPA believes that the state could allow a larger reporting threshold andstill be considered no less stringent. Under the above objective, for programapproval purposes, a state may decide to specifically guide and directspill responses through regulations or enforceable policies and procedures.EPA believes the selection of an approach in this area is a matter of administrativediscretion and is best left to state decision-makers who must choose howto effectively implement the program in their states. <ITAG tagnum="81">7. Release Response and Corrective Action (andSection; 281.35) </ITAG>An important objective of the federal program is that release responseand corrective action be taken as needed to protect human health and theenvironment at all sites with confirmed releases. For purposes of determiningwhether the state program will achieve this objective as effectively asthe corresponding federal requirements, the Agency proposed to evaluatethe stringency of a state release response and corrective action programby focusing on several key aspects. First, the state program must requirethat confirmed releases from the UST system are promptly stopped. Second,the state program must require immediate steps to stop migration of therelease, and ensure that health and safety hazards are quickly mitigated.Third, the state program must require that adverse impacts to soil andground water be investigated, identified, and cleaned up as necessary toprotect human health and the environment. Fourth, the state program mustrequire timely reporting of release responses and corrective actions taken,including information necessary to establish cleanup goals and to monitorcleanup progress at the site. As discussed in the preamble to the April 17 proposal (52 FR 12751), theexperiences of several state and local UST programs indicate that no matterwhat approach is taken in the regulations, the actual work associated withUST release response and corrective action in the field commonly translatesinto two general phases: (1) Immediate abatement actions that are typicallyrequired at many UST sites (for example, control of explosion threats andfree product removal), and (2) long-term release response and correctiveaction associated with soil and ground-water remediation. For purposesof state program approval, EPA proposed that state requirements could achievethe federal objectives for release response and corrective action withoutbeing identical to the federal technical standards. In fact, many of theoperating state and local UST programs have requirements that are moregeneral than the technical standards proposed by EPA. As discussed previouslyin today's preamble, when state requirements are more general in nature,they tend to place a greater burden on the state to supply site-specificdirections and to oversee more closely corrective actions taken. Recognizingthe need for clear technical direction at clean-up sites, some states haveestablished release response and corrective action funds that provide thestate agency with the capability to take over a significant part of theresponsibility for remedial action after the owner or operator reportsa release. Today's final technical requirements for release response and correctiveaction mandate that the owner and operator conduct an initial site investigationand promptly abate health and safety threats. Free product must also berecovered to prevent further movement of the released product within thesoil or ground water. Once the initial abatement of hazards has been completed,certain conditions may require that a more detailed soil and ground-waterinvestigation be undertaken. After each step in the corrective action process,the owner is required to report to the implementing agency. In some casesthe implementing agency may require a corrective action plan that specifieshow further cleanup will be conducted. At this point, further correctiveaction of soil or ground water proceeds on a site-specific basis. Several commenters responded to the Agency's request for input concerningthe proposed approach to the release response and corrective action objective.Most of them agreed with the flexibility provided by the proposed objectiveand stated that it not only provided for adequate protection of human healthand the environment but was also feasible for state agencies to implement.Another commenter expressed concern with the proposed objective, sayingthat it was too vague, and that almost all the details of the proposedfederal corrective action standards had been left out. This commenter alsopointed out that the objective omitted requirements for reporting and publicparticipation, and requested that they be included in the final objective.After considering all the comments, EPA agrees with the commenter who suggestedthat more detail had to be included in the objective for release responseand corrective action, and has provided more specificity in the final rule.In particular, the Agency has clarified in the objective that when a potentialthreat to human health exists, such as the presence of free product inthe soil or ground water, a more extensive investigation of contaminationmust be conducted. The Agency also agrees with this commenter that theobjective should be expanded to ensure that state programs include requirementsfor corrective action reporting and public participation in the correctiveaction process, and the final objective includes such requirements. In general, the Agency has concluded that the states should be left withthe flexibility to choose whether to adopt the federal corrective actionapproach or to adopt an alternative approach that is more suitable to thepattern of work and procedures already used by the implementing agency.Therefore, EPA believes that the overall goal of the federal requirementsin the area of release response and corrective action is to ensure thatthe basic release response and corrective action steps that may be necessaryat the site to protect human health and the environment be carried outat the site. In order to be no less stringent than the federal releaseresponse and corrective action program, the state's approach must ensurethat the same basic work will get done in as timely and effective a manneras is required by the corresponding federal technical requirements. Thisobjective can be met in a state that does not have all of EPA's releaseresponse and corrective action technical requirements in state regulations.In the same manner as the other objectives, EPA will require state programsto meet the underlying performance goals of the federal program, ratherthan all the details contained in the federal technical regulations. Thefollowing discussion addresses this final objective in greater detail.<T3>a. Assess and stop further releases (andSection; 281.35(a)). </T3>EPA'sfinal technical standards require that all confirmed releases are promptlyinvestigated and stopped (andSection; 280.61 in the final technical rule).To demonstrate the state program's stringency in comparison to this provisionof the federal objective, the state must provide requirements that ensurethat the owner and operator is obligated to promptly take action to assessand stop any ongoing releases at the site. The actions appropriate to stopa release will vary depending on how the release was confirmed (for example,through a tightness test or presence of fuel in nearby utility lines) aswell as the conditions at the site (such as a four-tank gasoline stationwith pressurized lines versus a one-tank operation with suction lines).If the confirmation of the release identifies the tank or piping componentresponsible for the release, then actions to prevent future releases couldinclude emptying the problem tank or not using the suspect piping run untilit is replaced or repaired. However, if the location of the source is unknown,then the entire UST system or systems will need to be considered suspectand addressed accordingly. The use of the word ``promptly'' in the objective is intended to mean thatthe state must require that owners and operators take such steps quicklyto minimize future releases. The less prompt such actions are, the morelikely it is that future releases will not be minimized and, therefore,the state's requirement will not be considered no less stringent by EPA.To provide adequate enforcement of such a requirement, the state must clearlydefine, using a number, the time frame within which an owner or operatoris expected to respond to this requirement. General state requirementsthat are further clarified by detailed technical guidance or policies willbe sufficient to demonstrate that a state program is no less stringentin this area. <T3>b. Initial abatement activities (andSection; 281.35(b)). </T3>EPA's finaltechnical standards require each site with a confirmed release to be investigatedand addressed to ensure that any immediate threats to health and safetyare identified and brought under control (andSection; 280.62 in the finaltechnical rule). Under the federal program, some of the concerns that mustbe identified and addressed at the site include: Explosive gas levels orvapor threats that are due to the exposure of contaminated soils; the off-siteimpacts of free product (or resulting vapors) on nearby water, sewer lines,or in building basements; and the location of any nearby ground-water userswho could be exposed to or threatened by dissolved contaminants in theirdrinking water. The objective underlying these federal requirements isto ensure that owners and operators take action to identify, contain, andmitigate any immediate health and safety threats that are posed by a release(such as mitigation of explosive or other hazards posed by released gasor vapors). Accordingly, a state is no less stringent than the federalprogram if its program contains such requirements. The actions taken tomitigate the effects of the release at a particular site will be tailoredto the nature of the release and the sensitivity of the site and the surroundingarea. (See the discussion on this subject provided in the preamble to thefinal technical standards rule published elsewhere in today's <T4>Federal Register</T4>.) The state may decide to have an inspector immediatelyconduct a review of the site, or it may instruct the owner and operatorto do the review and submit the information to the state. The state programmust clarify the general actions that the owner and operator are expectedto perform to identify, contain, and mitigate any immediate health andsafety hazards. In addition, the state must require that the site mustbe investigated for free product, and if present, begin free product removal.<T3>c. Investigation of impacts on soil and ground water (andSection; 281.35(c)).</T3>Another important aspect of the release response and corrective actionobjective is the investigation and identification of the extent of adverseimpacts on soil and ground water at all sites with confirmed releases.EPA's final technical standards rule includes the requirement to investigateall sites to characterize the presence of contamination in the area ofthis site most likely to have been impacted (e.g., below the excavationzone; see andSection; 280.63 in the final technical standards rule). A moredetailed investigation of the extent of soil and ground water contamination(including dissolved product) is required if free product is present onor within the aquifer, or if contaminated soil is in contact with groundwater (andSection; 280.65 in the final technical rule). Even if these conditionsare not present, the implementing agency can require the more detailedsite investigation if a potential threat to nearby surface or ground wateris believed to exist. To be no less stringent than these federal technical standards, a statemust provide requirements that mandate an initial investigation of everysite with a release to identify possible adverse impacts on soil, groundwater, and nearby surface waters. The state requirements could establishthe need to characterize the extent of ground-water contamination at allsites (which would be more stringent than the federal approach) or alternativelythe state could require that a more extensive investigation be performedbased on site conditions identified during an initial investigation. Ifthe second approach is used, the state must develop a method or policyfor determining when further site investigation is required, and this policymust include the existence of a potential threat to human health and theenvironment. Potential threats may include evidence that drinking waterwells have been affected, that free product is present on or within theaquifer, or that contaminated soil is in contact with the ground water.As with the other aspects of the release response and corrective actionobjective, more detailed requirements concerning what constitutes an initialversus a full site investigation, and when a detailed investigation mustbe conducted, can be established by the state through the use of guidelines,written policies, and implementation protocols and procedures as long asthe owner and operator will be required to undertake the investigationwhen requested by the implementing agency. In response to a concern raised by one commenter, this aspect of the overallobjective has been modified to require investigation for nearby surfacewater impacts. This amendment is consistent with a change made to the finaltechnical standards in andSection; 280.65(a)(4).<T3>d. Soil and ground-water remediation (andSection; 281.35(d)).</T3> Anotherobjective for release response and corrective action is the cleanup ofcontaminated soil and ground water identified at the site as necessaryto protect human health and the environment. For example, the extent ofremediation may be based on a site-specific risk analysis that includespotential human exposure. Alternatively, a state may use statewide numericalstandards to establish cleanup levels at a site. In evaluating this aspectof the objective, the Agency does not intend to distinguish between thetwo approaches when determining whether a program is no less stringent.In either case, the state requirements must ensure that remediation providesadequate protection of human health and the environment. To be approved as no less stringent, EPA will consider the following pointsin evaluating whether the state program provides for release response andcorrective action as necessary to protect human health and the environment.The state must have authority to require an owner and operator to developand submit for approval information concerning how remediation of contaminatedsoil, ground water, and nearby surface water at the site will be conducted(andSection; 281.35(e)). In addition, the state must be able to require theimplementation of steps for release response and corrective action afterthey have been identified. The release response and corrective action stepsmust consider the risk posed to human health and the environment by contaminationat the site and address potential routes of human exposure. <T3>e. Reporting on corrective actions taken (andSection; 281.35(e)).</T3>Another objective of federal release response and corrective action requirementsis to require the owner and operator to report to the implementing agencyon corrective actions taken in response to confirmed releases. In today'sfinal technical standards rule, EPA requires the owner or operator to submitstatus reports and to report plans for future corrective action activities,such as free product removal or soil and ground-water remediation (andSection;andSection;280.61 through 280.65 in the final technical standards rule). The proposedrelease response and corrective action objective for determining no lessstringent state programs inadvertently did not include provisions for correctiveaction reporting. EPA agrees with the commenter who argued that this isan important aspect of state corrective action programs and that reportingmust be included in the final rule as a no-less-stringent criterion. Acertain amount of reporting and recordkeeping on the part of owners andoperators is necessary for adequate oversight by the implementing agencyand to ensure that owners and operators properly carry out their correctiveaction responsibilities. Thus, today's final rule includes an added objectivethat makes clear that states must require timely and complete reportingon corrective action steps planned and taken (andSection; 281.35(e)). Thischange makes the final objective fully consistent with the correspondingfederal technical standards in the final rule, and responds to the concernraised by public comment. In determining whether a state program meets the objective in the areaof corrective action reporting, EPA does not require that states copy thesame details as are required in the federal standards. General reportingrequirements that obligate the owner and operator to report on correctiveactions taken and planned should be sufficient for a state to meet thisobjective. EPA will examine the following factors in determining whethera state is no less stringent than this aspect of the release response andcorrective action objective. The reporting on corrective action plans mustresult in the information being made available to the state quickly toensure that steps are being taken to prevent further contamination, andso that technical direction can be provided by the state. In addition,the level of detail reported to the state should be sufficient to overseethe process of corrective action and ensure technical adequacy. The stateshould be able to require reporting on all phases of corrective actionto ensure that corrective action in fact is taking place and is sufficientto protect human health and the environment. In addition, information onthe site and the surrounding area should be reported so that the correctiveaction can be tailored to the specific conditions of the site and the natureof the release. Initial corrective action steps, results of investigationsof soils and ground water, and plans and status reports on long-term remediationof contamination at the site are among the types of specific informationthat the state might require <T3>f. Public participation in release response and corrective action (andSection;281.35(f)).</T3> To achieve this aspect of the objective, the state mustprovide opportunity for public participation when a confirmed release requiresa corrective action plan. This provision was not included in the objectiveproposed in the December 23 Supplemental Notice. In order to respond toconcerns raised by public comment on the proposal, and to remain fullyconsistent with the final federal technical standard (andSection; 280.67),a public participation provision has been added to the final release responseand corrective action objective. Section 7004(b) of RCRA and long-standing Agency policy indicate a needto be open to the involvement of any interested member of the public insite-specific cleanup decisions. EPA does not intend to prescribe the natureand extent of the public involvement procedures to be followed by the state.Rather, EPA's intention is that a forum be provided that is in keepingwith the state's administrative procedures for the interested public toexpress its views on the proposed corrective actions for serious UST releases.To achieve this aspect of the federal objective, the state must ensureopen access to information pertaining to specific corrective actions forthose members of the public that are potentially affected by the releaseor any planned corrective action. EPA does not expect this to be a significantadditional burden because many states already have been involving the publicin the decisionmaking process for UST cleanups for many years. For example,many states already allow for public access to their site files and thosemost affected by the release are usually kept well informed through personalcontacts with the state response staff. <ITAG tagnum="81">8. Out-of-Service UST Systems and Closure (andSection; 281.36) </ITAG>EPA has concluded that UST systems temporarily or permanently closed canpose a significant threat to human health and the environment if they arenot managed properly. To be no less stringent in this program element,the state must demonstrate that it can satisfy two objectives: (1) Releasesfrom temporarily closed UST systems must be minimized, and (2) future releasesmust be prevented, and existing conditions needing corrective action identifiedand corrected at permanent closure. EPA believes these goals can be metin different ways. To ensure that releases are minimized from temporarily closed UST systems,the state must mandate that the general operating requirements continueto be practiced (andSection; 281.36(a)(1)). For those tanks where productremains in the UST system, the release detection, corrosion protection,reporting, and release response and corrective action requirements mustbe followed to achieve these general operating requirements A state mayallow release detection requirements to cease if all product is removedfrom temporarily closed UST systems (andSection; 281.36(a)(2)).Another aspect of the closure objective states that each UST system mustbe closed-off to outside access if it is temporarily closed (andSection;281.36(a)(3)). Although this was not addressed in the proposed objective,it is included in today's final rule in order to follow more closely theintent of the corresponding technical standards in this area. The objectivereflects the underlying concern in the final technical standards that atank temporarily closed for extended periods of time could (unknown tothe owner and operator) be tampered with or misused as a waste sump orstorage pit, or otherwise become the source of accidents during the periodof temporary closure. To be able to satisfy this aspect of the objective,the state program must specify when a tank system is considered to be temporarilyclosed due to the fact that it has been removed from service. EPA's final technical standard specifies that the tank must be closed-offfrom outside access if the UST system is temporarily closed for greaterthan 3 months. The objective has been written to allow some state administrativediscretion as to what defines an ``extended period of time'' for temporaryclosure. Thus, while this means that states will not be held strictly tothe 90-day time period specified in the final technical standards for closingoff outside access to the tank, the state still must establish clearlywhen temporary closure begins in order to meet this objective. Also, thelonger a state allows for a definition of ``temporary'', the less likelythey will be able to demonstrate that they are no less stringent in thisarea. EPA's final technical standards set a maximum limit of 1 year for allowingunprotected tanks to be closed temporarily, unless the implementing agencyallows a longer time period on a site-by-site basis. This time period limitationis primarily to make sure that permanent closure takes place, and the casualtemporary abandonment of numerous unprotected USTs for extended periodsof time is thereby avoided. Although this subject also was not addressedin the proposed objective, it is included in the final objective to moreclosely reflect the intention of the final technical standards. To meetthis objective, the state must ensure that unprotected UST systems do notremain out of service for more than one year. A state may choose to allowextensions to this one year limit, in which case the state must requirethat a site assessment be conducted to make sure that a release has notalready occurred from the UST system. The time limit for the temporaryclosure of USTs has been set at one year to ensure that owners and operatorsof unprotected USTs that are unused are held responsible for protectingthe UST system from corrosion or permanently closing it. If the unprotectedUST system is new or has been protected from corrosion, then the tank mayremain temporarily out of service for an indefinite period of time (althoughthe other requirements for temporary closure still apply). Adverse environmental and public health impacts at all permanently closedUST systems may be caused by future releases as well as past releases.To avoid these impacts, the state must mandate that regulated substancesand accumulated sludge be removed prior to closure and that the site conditionaround the UST system be assessed. To determine if there are any presentor past releases at closure, the state should ensure that the conditionof the site below the UST system is evaluated by the owner and operator.This evaluation can be done by any of the methods allowed at the federallevel or approved by the state as protective of human health and the environment.The state may choose to hold owners and operators responsible for usingappropriate national codes of practice or specify the particular stepsneeded to ensure a tank is completely emptied and cleaned. EPA's technical standard for closure also mandates notification beforepermanent closure so that a state or local inspector may choose to be present.For purposes of program approval the state is only required to have ownersand operators report at the time of closure. EPA has concluded prior notificationis not essential to achieving the underlying objective in this area, particularlyif a state has established a different method of compliance monitoringand has decided that notice before closure is unnecessary under that approach.If the site assessment confirms the existence of a release requiring somecorrective action, then release response and corrective action requirementsmust be followed.<ITAG tagnum="81">9. Financial Responsibility (andSection; 281.37_Reserved) </ITAG>An important objective of the federal program is that owners and operatorsof UST systems containing petroleum have adequate financial responsibilityto undertake corrective action and meet third-party liability claims. Anobjective for financial responsibility was proposed in the December 23,1987 Supplemental Notice. The federal law mandates $1 million per occurrencewith appropriate aggregate amounts as the minimum level of assurance neededby most owners and operators of petroleum UST systems to meet cleanup andliability costs for a one-time release. The final objective in this areawill be provided at a later date when the final technical requirementsfor financial responsibility are promulgated by EPA. States will need tobe no less stringent in this area to be able to receive program approvalfrom EPA. <ITAG tagnum="81">10. Financial Responsibility for UST Systems Containing HazardousSubstances (andSection; 281.38_Reserved) </ITAG>EPA is also developing financial responsibility requirements for USTs containinghazardous substances. These regulations will require owners and operatorsto maintain evidence that funds are readily available in the event of arelease from their USTs to pay for the costs of corrective action and third-partyliability for property damage and bodily injury. On February 9, 1988, EPAissued an Advance Notice of Proposed Rulemaking for financial responsibilityrequirements for USTs containing hazardous substances (53 FR 3818). Inthis advance notice of proposed rulemaking, EPA solicited comments andinformation about the approaches under consideration. The Agency intendsto propose financial responsibility requirements for USTs containing hazardoussubstances in the near future, and at that time, a federal objective forsuch requirements will also be proposed for purposes of state program approval.Until these requirements are finalized, EPA is reserving this section oftoday's state program approval rule for this federal objective. For a stateto receive program approval, a state does not currently need to have theauthority to write financial responsibility requirements for USTs containinghazardous substances. However, if a state plans to regulate UST systemscontaining hazardous substances in the state program, then the state shouldconsider obtaining the necessary authority in the near future. When EPApromulgates final requirements for financial responsibility for UST systemscontaining hazardous substances, each state with an approved program willhave to submit a revision that incorporates corresponding changes intoits state program. D. Subpart D_Adequate Enforcement of Compliance (andSection;andSection; 281.40through 281.43) In the April 17, 1987 proposed rule, the Agency set minimum requirementsfor states seeking to demonstrate adequate enforcement of compliance forprogram approval. In the proposed andSection;andSection; 281.30 through 281.32,the Agency set forth three categories of requirements: (1) Legal authoritiesand procedures for collecting and maintaining data on the regulated community;(2) legal authorities for enforcement that must be available to the implementingagency; and (3) options for either procedural requirements or legal authoritiesfor public participation. Section 281.33 of the proposed rule set requirementsfor sharing of information. The Agency received several comments on thissubpart of the proposal and is today clarifying in the final rule its expectationsof what constitutes adequate enforcement of compliance for purposes ofstate program approval. The final requirements are discussed in detailin this section of the preamble. In summary, under today's final rules (andSection;andSection; 281.40 through281.43), states must have adequate compliance monitoring authority so thattank owners or operators can be required by the state to furnish informationrelated to their tanks and conduct monitoring or testing. States must alsohave authority to enter and inspect any site subject to regulation. Inaddition, a state must have procedures for: Inspections; evaluation ofrecords; recordkeeping; enforcement against violators; and encouragingcitizen reports of suspected violations. A state must also have enforcementauthority sufficient to: Immediately restrain violators or potential violatorsby order or by suit; sue in a court of competent jurisdiction; and assessor sue to recover civil penalties and procedures to implement these authorities.Finally, a state must provide for public participation in enforcement proceedingsby using one of three public participation options: Providing one of twotypes of authority to allow citizen intervention in civil actions; or moregeneral public involvement procedures in compliance monitoring and enforcementactions. In the preamble to the proposed rule (52 FR 12856), the Agency requestedcomments on how it should evaluate compliance monitoring and enforcementprocedural requirements in state programs, for example, in the form ofbroad objectives or specific requirements. Many commenters expressed concernregarding the amount of flexibility to be allowed in developing state enforcementprograms. Several commenters requested that states only be required tomeet broad objectives in the regulations or in guidance. One commenterasked that enforcement procedural requirements be clearly outlined anddefined. In response to the comments, the Agency is clarifying its expectationsfor the requirements for adequate enforcement of compliance. In developingthe requirements for adequate enforcement, the Agency seeks to maintainflexibility in approving a variety of state programs, and encourages statesto use innovative approaches in monitoring compliance and carrying outenforcement actions. Consistent with that intent, today's regulations donot mandate the details of compliance monitoring and enforcement proceduresfor purposes of program approval. Instead, the regulations set forth certainauthorities and programs or procedural areas that should enable a stateprogram to demonstrate adequate enforcement of compliance with its technicalrequirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">(Note that the insertion of the no-less-stringent criteria (in SubpartC andSection; 281.30 of the final rule) has caused the adequate enforcementrequirements to be reorganized into Subpart D, andSection;andSection; 281.40to 281.43 of the final rule.)<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Requirements for a Compliance Monitoring Program (andSection; 281.40)</ITAG><T3>a. Legal authorities for compliance (andSection; 281.40 (a)-(c)). </T3>ProposedandSection; 281.30 (a) and (b) required that state employees have the authorityto obtain from an owner or operator any information on their USTs necessaryto determine compliance. State employees must also have the authority torequire the owner or operator to conduct monitoring or testing, and theauthority to enter the site to conduct such testing themselves. One commenter suggested that these authorities, particularly the authorityto require the owner or operator to conduct testing, will place unnecessaryburdens on the owner and operator. The Agency believes that these authorities,which are analogous to federal authorities under Subtitle I, are necessaryto ensure that states have the means of monitoring compliance, gatheringnecessary information, and assessing the potential risk to human healthand the environment. The Agency is promulgating the language of these sectionssubstantially as proposed. The Agency is clarifying today the intent of this section by making twochanges. First, the term ``employee of the state'' as it appeared in proposedandSection; 281.30(a) has been replaced by the language of Subtitle I, Section9005, which provides for such inspection authority for ``any officer, employee,or representative or the Environmental Protection Agency duly designatedby the Administrator * * * or <T3>any officer, employee, or representative of a state </T3>with an approvedprogram.'' Since the proposal, the Agency has become concerned that theterm in the statute may be construed to be broader in scope than ``employee'';thus, for purposes of the final rule, the Agency has substituted the law'smore inclusive language. Because of the nature of the regulated universe,many states are likely to depend on personnel other than state employeesto inspect, monitor, and test UST systems. For example, the implementingagency may delegate such responsibility to the local building inspectoror fire marshal. Because the Agency did not intend to restrict the originalauthority provided by the statute to only employees of the state, the term``employee'' is being replaced by ``representative'' in the final rule'sandSection; 281.40(a). The term ``employees'' is being replaced by ``representative''in the final rule's andSection; 281.40(b) for the same reasons. Second, in order to be consistent with the terms and definitions foundin 40 CFR 280.12, and the wording used in the rest of the technical standardsfinalized elsewhere today, the Agency is replacing the phrases ``his/hertanks, tank contents, and associated equipment'' in proposed andSection;281.30 (a) and (b) with the more concise term, ``the UST system'', in thefinal rule's andSection; 281.40 (a) and (b). This change does not alter thesubstantive meaning of the requirement. The phrases ``underground storagetank'' and ``underground storage tank program'' in andSection; 281.30(b)of the proposed rule were replaced with ``UST system'' in the final rule'sandSection; 281 40(c) for the same reason. <T3>b. Procedures for compliance monitoring (andSection;andSection; 281.40(d) through (g)). </T3>Proposed andSection; 281.30 (c) through (g) set requirementsfor compliance monitoring programs, including inspections and record reviews.Several commenters requested that the Agency clarify its expectations regardinga compliance monitoring program. These commenters were primarily concernedthat the Agency may be restricting flexibility in developing compliancemonitoring programs by requiring certain types and numbers of inspectionsunder these programs. Furthermore, these commenters were concerned thatthe proposed regulatory language could be interpreted as requiring resource-intensiveactivities, such as a minimum number of scheduled inspections and comprehensivesurveys of all UST systems.Although the proposed regulations set general requirements for a compliancemonitoring program, the Agency did not intend that states must developa ``traditional'' inspection and record collection program for purposesof state program approval. In particular, the Agency has no intention ofrequiring states to undertake a specific number of inspections, recordreviews, or enforcement actions. As discussed above, the Agency's intentionwas and still is to provide the states with maximum flexibility consistentwith statutory requirements. Thus, the Agency intends to approve programswith innovative approaches to gathering compliance data as long as theyadequately ensure compliance. Such compliance monitoring and inspectionprograms may range from programs that target portions of the tank population,to programs that use permitting. The Agency is clarifying this intent inthe final rule by making several changes to proposed andSection;andSection;281.30 (d)-(g). These requirements and associated comments are addressedin greater detail below. andbullet; <T3>Requirements for record collection (andSection; 281.40(d)). </T3>ProposedandSection; 281.30(c) required states to have procedures for receiving, evaluating,and investigating all records and reports and for investigating failureto submit these reports. The Agency is promulgating the language of thissection_now numbered andSection; 281.40(d)_substantially as proposed. Comments on this section expressed a general concern that the requirementsmay be resource-intensive. One commenter requested clarification on howthe proposed requirements would be interpreted. Specifically, the commenterasked how it might determine if an owner or operator failed to submit records,and what proportions of those identified must be investigated. The Agencybelieves that it is neither desirable nor necessary to promulgate additionalrequirements that specify procedures for receipt and investigation of requiredrecords and reports. The general wording in the final rule was retainedin order to provide maximum flexibility for states in developing theseprograms. In response to the commenters' concerns, it is the Agency's intentto encourage states to develop a potentially wide range of procedures thatallow the implementing agency to identify owners and operators who havenot submitted required records and reports. Consistent with this approach, the Agency has not specified proceduresfor identifying noncompliance. Therefore, in promulgating andSection; 281.40(d),the Agency is clarifying its intent by deleting the word ``all'' from thelanguage in the proposal. Section 281.40(d), as promulgated, requires statesto develop procedures for evaluating records and reports but does not specifythe number or percentage of reports to be evaluated. For further clarification, the Agency is also deleting the word ``possible''from the phrase ``possible enforcement.'' ``Possible'' was removed becauseit was only needed where ``all'' records had to be evaluated, but thisfinal action does not change the meaning. The Agency believes that thediscretion to undertake an enforcement action is inherent in the state'sauthority to run the program. The proposal established that state programs ``must provide for investigationfor enforcement of failure to submit these records and reports'', and todaythe Agency is removing the phrase ``for investigation'' from the finalwording in andSection; 281.40(d) to clarify its intent not to limit specificmeans of enforcement. Under the final rule, the implementing agency musthave a program for investigating owners' or operators' failure to submitrecords or reports for purposes of determining whether enforcement is warranted.The Agency thus clarifies that the states have discretion to determinewhether, when, and by what means such failure warrants further investigationand enforcement actions. andbullet; <T3>Requirements for inspection procedures (andSection; 281.40 (e)(1) and(e)(2)).</T3> The proposed andSection; 281.30(d) required states to haveinspection and surveillance procedures, including periodic inspections,to ensure compliance with program requirements. For clarification, theproposed andSection; 281.30 (d) and (e) have been renumbered, respectively,as andSection; 281.40(e)(1) and andSection; 281.40(e)(2). The Agency received a number of comments on these proposed requirements,particularly the definition of ``shall maintain a program for periodicinspections.'' Many commenters were concerned about the resources thatwould be necessary to implement a traditional inspection program with respectto the UST universe. One commenter requested that the Agency specify thenumber of inspections to be accomplished within a given time period andthe frequency of inspections. The Agency agrees with the commenters thatthe requirements for inspection and surveillance, as proposed, could suggestthat a traditional inspection program is required for program approval,which would be impossibly resource-intensive given the large UST universe.This was not the Agency's intent. Therefore, the final rule's requirementshave changed the wording of the proposed andSection; 281.30(d) to clarifythat greater flexibility is available in this area for purpose of approvingstate programs. In promulgating andSection; 281.40(e)(1) today, the Agency has retained thegeneral requirement that the state has inspection procedures, but has replacedthe description of ``periodic'' inspections with ``systematic'' inspections.The Agency has promulgated a requirement for ``systematic'' inspectionsto clarify its expectations with regard to state inspection programs. TheAgency expects states to conduct inspections but has chosen not to mandatea particular number of inspections within a specified time period. Instead,the Agency encourages states to develop a method for determining when toconduct inspections and encourages other, more innovative methods of determiningcompliance. Examples of systematic inspection programs include targetinginspections to certain tank groups or tank activities (for example, atclosure) and developing permitting programs. In the preamble to the proposed rule, the Agency requested comment on theneed for requiring enforcement procedures. One commenter noted that states'legal, procedural, and institutional processes and structures are relevantto assessing adequate enforcement. The Agency agrees that an adequate enforcementprogram must not only have the legal authorities to carry out enforcementactions, but also the procedures for exercising these authorities. To clarifythat intent, the Agency has added to andSection; 281.40(e)(1), the requirementthat states provide for enforcement of failure to comply with program requirements.This requirement is consistent with final andSection; 281.40(d), which requiresthat states not only have procedures for receipt of records and reportsbut also provide for enforcement of failure to submit such documents. Inaddition, this requirement will ensure that the regulated community andthe public are provided with an opportunity to learn what procedures willbe in effect in the state. The proposed andSection; 281.30(e) set requirements for the manner in whichcompliance monitoring information will be gathered. The purpose of theserequirements was to ensure that all types of state inspection procedureswere conducted in a manner that will produce evidence admissible in court.States are expected to be well aware of the need to conduct inspectionsproperly for these reasons, and should be easily able to demonstrate compliancewith this requirement. No comments were received on this requirement, andthe Agency is making adjustments only to remain consistent with the changesto the inspection program requirement, as described above, and renumberingthe subsection to emphasize its purpose as an addendum to the previousrequirement. andbullet; <T3>Requirements for public reporting (andSection; 281.40(f)).</T3> Section281.30(f) of the proposed rule required states to develop a program forencouraging and processing public reports of violations. The purpose ofthe proposed requirement was to ensure that state applicants' efforts tomonitor compliance were open to this important additional source of informationregarding compliance. Several commenters, however, did not understand thepurpose and scope of this requirement. One commenter requested clarificationon what type of citizen complaints had to be addressed by the program.For example, would speculation concerning a possible violation be considereda complaint that must be investigated? The final requirements have been revised to ensure that states developprograms that respond to public reports of both speculated or confirmedviolations. The purpose of this requirement is to encourage citizens toprovide information to implementing agencies_for example, report a suspectedrelease_that may be crucial to early response, investigation, and complianceefforts by the implementing agency. Such a program is particularly crucialin light of the large UST universe and the impracticality of large-scaleenforcement efforts. This clarification of the scope of this requirement,however, is not intended by the Agency to require states to develop a substantialpublic outreach program. On the contrary, providing a telephone line forcitizens to call if they suspect a leak or other violations would be thebasic kind of program that will meet this requirement. Accordingly, theAgency has reworded andSection; 281.40(f) of the final rule to clarify thatstate investigation procedures must allow for follow-up on tips and otherreports and complaints to determine their validity. The Agency, however,is not promulgating specific requirements concerning such a program, andstates are encouraged to adopt follow-up procedures that are tailored totheir specific UST programs.andbullet; <T3>Requirements for monitoring compliance over time (andSection; 281.40(g)).</T3>Section 281.30(g) of the proposed rule required states to maintain a ``programwhich is capable of making comprehensive surveys of all facilities andactivities subject to regulations,'' and that any resulting compilation,index, or inventory of such facilities be made available to EPA upon request.Many commenters objected to this requirement because of the significantresource demands it would impose on the states. In particular, one commenterwas concerned about having to maintain the capabilities to conduct ``comprehensivesurveys of all facilities and activities,'' and because this would be extremelyresource-intensive, the commenter asked for more guidelines in implementingthis requirement. Another commenter questioned the requirement for approvablestates to provide EPA, upon request, an inventory or list of facilitiesin violation of UST requirements, because it would be burdensome and unnecessary.The primary purpose of this requirement, as proposed, was to ensure thatstates are able to assemble information on the regulated community thatcan be used to measure their compliance status. This requirement is basedon section 9002 of Subtitle I, which mandates the establishment of stateinventories, and the necessity of such inventories for effective compliancemonitoring. The Agency intended to allow states flexibility in determininghow extensive the survey undertaking must be, provided that they achievethe purpose of measuring compliance. In response to concerns of the commenters,and to clarify its intent, the Agency has substantially altered proposedandSection; 281.30(g) by deleting the first sentence pertaining to a programfor making ``comprehensive surveys.'' The final rule simply requires thata state program must maintain the data collected through inspections andevaluation of records in a manner that allows the implementing agency tomonitor over time the compliance status of the regulated community. Section 281.40(g) also requires that states make any compilation, index,or inventory of such facilities and activities available to EPA upon request.With respect to the commenter who questioned the necessity of using suchinventories to oversee state actions, the Agency wishes to clarify thatthis requirement was not intended to be used as an oversight tool. Althoughthe Agency is promulgating this part of the requirement as proposed, theAgency does not intend to request submission of this information on a regularbasis and will negotiate specific reporting requirements with the statesas part of the MOA and the annual state grant process. The Agency prefersthat reporting of information on state enforcement programs be managedthrough the MOA between the state and the EPA Regional Administrator. TheRegions will negotiate specific reporting requirements with each of theirstates and will incorporate those requirements into the State Grant Workplan.andbullet; <T3>Requirements for updating of notification. </T3>The preamble to theproposed rule (52 FR 12857) described how the Agency considered and rejectedrequiring states to include a requirement for updating UST notificationinformation by owners and operators as a condition of state program approval.This issue was raised in the proposal in the context of adequate enforcementof compliance; however, the Agency considers it to be primarily a no lessstringent issue. This issue is discussed earlier in today's preamble insection C.2. <ITAG tagnum="81">2. Requirements for Enforcement Authority (andSection; 281.41) </ITAG>The proposed andSection; 281.31 established requirements for legal authoritiesfor enforcement. The Agency proposed that states demonstrate some specificenforcement authorities as a condition of program approval. This was toensure that states have sufficient authorities to carry out an enforcementprogram in lieu of the federal program. The final rule includes only afew changes to the proposed requirements. The proposed andSection; 281.31(a) specified the authorities necessary toimplement remedies for violations of state program requirements. Section281.31(a)(1) required that states have the authority to issue a temporaryrestraining order that would prevent violators or potential violators byorder or by suit from engaging in unauthorized activity that is endangeringor causing damage to public health or the environment. One commenter requestedthat the Agency define ``unauthorized activity''. This term is intendedto include any activities that result in noncompliance with the regulations.The Agency is promulgating this requirement_now numbered andSection; 281.41(a)_substantiallyas proposed. Section 281.31(a)(2) in the proposed rule required that states have authorityto sue in a court of competent jurisdiction for a preliminary or permanentinjunction. The Agency received no comments on this section and is promulgatingthe requirement as proposed. Both this section and andSection; 281.31(a)(1)in the proposed rule_now numbered andSection; 281.41(a)(1) and (a)(2)_arestandard legal authorities and are often located in a general enforcementstatute. The Agency expects that most states should be able to easily satisfythese requirements. Section 281.31(a)(3) of the proposed rule set the authorities that stateswere required to have to recover civil penalties. In this section, theAgency required states to be able to recover civil penalties for failureto notify or for submitting false notification information ``up to at least$10,000 per tank.'' For failure to comply with state requirements or standards,the penalties were required to be assessible ``up to at least $10,000''for each tank for each day of violation. The Agency received a number of comments concerning the penalty authorities,particularly regarding the phrase ``up to at least $10,000'' for each dayof violation of state requirements. Several commenters interpreted therule to mean that EPA was dictating a <T3>minimum </T3>civil penalty of $10,000. These commenters argued thatthe determination of whether civil penalties are necessary for effectiveimplementation should be made at the state level. The Agency agrees with the commenters that the proposed language in thissection was unclear as written, and is clarifying that the intent is torequire states to have authority to assess a wide range of penalties eitherfor each violation or for each tank system for each day of violation. Therefore,the Agency is promulgating this revised section as andSection; 281.41(a)(3)of the final rule to require that states ``be capable of assessing civilpenalties up to'' the requisite amount per violation or for each tank foreach day of violation. One commenter requested that EPA lower the limitfor the penalty authority from $10,000 to $5,000 for each tank for eachday of violation and suggested that a $5,000 penalty level was sufficientto promote compliance. The Agency agrees with this commenter and has changedthe requirement for civil penalties accordingly. The penalty level wasoriginally set at $10,000 for each tank for each day of violation to reflectthe penalty authority that Congress provided to EPA for enforcement ofthe federal program. States, however, do not necessarily have to have thesame penalty level authority to run an adequate UST program. A high penaltylevel is often used as an incentive for compliance, and generally statesdo not actually ever exercise this authority to the full amount. In addition,much of the regulated community consists of small businesses, thereforea $5,000 penalty level is more than adequate to promote compliance. EPAnotes that most states already have the authority to assess $5,000 foreach violation. The language change in this section is also consistentwith the Agency's intent to allow states flexibility in carrying out enforcementactions. Under the promulgated andSection; 281.41(a)(3), states may determineduring specific enforcement actions that a lower penalty may be sufficientto ensure compliance, and similarly are not restricted to $5,000 for eachtank for each day of violation as a maximum penalty if additional authorityis obtained. Thus, EPA expects that a state will evaluate violations ona case-by-case basis, and enforce fines according to the severity of environmentalhazard, the intentions of the owner and operator, a history of past violations,or other extenuating circumstances. The proposed andSection; 281.31 (b) and (c)_now andSection; 281.41 (b) and(c) in the final rule_required standard enforcement authorities regardingburden of proof and appropriateness of penalties sought to violations detected.The Agency received no comment on these requirements and no changes havebeen made since proposal. <ITAG tagnum="81">3. Requirements for Public Participation (andSection; 281.42) </ITAG>The proposed andSection; 281.32 set forth three options that states may choosefrom to ensure that the opportunity for public participation in enforcementproceedings is provided. The purpose of providing public participationin the decisionmaking process is to promote public involvement in implementationof the UST program in the state. The first option set in the proposed andSection;281.32 was authority that allows intervention as of right in any civilaction to enforce UST requirements. The second option was assurance thatthe implementing agency will provide at least 30 days for public commenton all proposed settlements; will investigate and provide written responsesto all citizen complaints; and will not oppose citizen intervention. Thethird option was authority to allow intervention analogous to Federal Rule24(a)(2). To fulfill this requirement, states must comply with only oneof the three options.The Agency received a number of comments on the requirements for publicparticipation. It appears that many commenters did not understand thatonly one of the three options must be met. Several commenters expressedthe opinion that the Agency's requirements were inappropriate for a rulethat emphasized flexibility in state program development. For example,several commenters objected to EPA's dictating the level of public participationin enforcement proceedings. The commenters argued that states and localitieshave more expertise than the federal government in identifying circumstancesin which public participation is appropriate. Another concern expressedby commenters is that certain public participation procedures may strainavailable resources. In particular, commenters objected to the requirementin the proposed andSection; 281.32(b)(2) that states investigate <T3>all </T3>citizen complaints. Commenters also objected to the requirementthat states provide 30 days for public comment on all proposed settlementsof civil enforcement actions. One commenter indicated that this requirementwould be a tremendous burden on implementing agencies. Conversely, onecommenter objected to the option approach, and stressed the need for veryspecific public participation requirements. The Agency has retained the option approach in the final rule because eachof the options separately provides an adequate opportunity for public participation,and requiring all three options would be unnecessary. To emphasize thatthe Agency is providing options for this requirement, the Agency has addedthe phrase ``any one of the following three options'' to the first sentencein andSection; 281.42 of the final rule. The Agency has also changed theorder of the requirements for clarification. The option for the authoritypresented in the proposed andSection; 281.32(c) is promulgated as the firstoption in andSection; 281.42(a) of the final rule. The Agency has presentedthis authority first because it recognizes that most states will alreadyhave an authority analogous to Federal Rule 24(a)(2). Several commentersfrom state agencies noted that they have this authority. The other optionsfor legal authority proposed in andSection; 281.32 are renumbered accordingly:Proposed andSection; 281.32(a) is now andSection; 281.42(b); proposed andSection;281.32(b) is now andSection; 281.42(c). Because the Agency received a number of comments regarding the specificrequirements for the third option_proposed as andSection; 281.32(b)_the Agencyhas made several changes in this requirement as andSection; 281.42(c) ofthe final rule. The Agency has revised the requirement that states ensure``public notice of and provide at least 30 days for'' public comment. Inthe final rule, the Agency has simply required that states must ``providenotice and opportunity for'' public comment. These changes will allow thestate to develop procedures for notification in methods other than publishing(which implied that states may have to publish all notices in a newspaper).The Agency has also deleted the requirement that responses to <T3>all</T3> citizen complaints must be written. The Agency does not believethat the specifics in the requirement are necessary to ensure public participation;given the nature of the universe, responding in writing to all citizencomplaints would be an overwhelming burden on state and local resources.Many citizen complaints can be handled effectively by telephone. In thefinal requirement, the method of response is not specified, and the word``all'' is deleted. The new language reflects the need for flexibilityin UST enforcement due to the nature of the regulated universe <ITAG tagnum="81">4. Sharing of information (andSection; 281.43) </ITAG>The proposed andSection; 281.33(a) set forth procedures for states to sharewith the Agency information obtained or used in the state program. Section281.33(b) of the proposed rule indicated that the Agency will furnish approvedstates with any information necessary for administering the state program.Information submitted to the Agency under a claim of confidentiality subjectto the conditions in 40 CFR Part 2 will not necessarily be treated as confidentialby the state unless the owner and operator reapplies for confidentiality.The Agency received no comment on this section and is promulgating it inthe final rule in andSection; 281.43. E. Subpart E_Approval Procedures (andSection;andSection; 281.50 through 281.52)<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Approval Procedures for State Programs (andSection; 281.50) </ITAG>States may submit an application for approval on the date of promulgationof the federal technical requirements. Though states may apply to operateall aspects of the UST program for both petroleum and hazardous substancetanks, approval of state UST programs may also occur in phases Section9004 of RCRA authorizes interim approval of state programs for a brieftime-period and also authorizes approval of certain types of partial programs(this is discussed under the analysis of the program description earlierin this preamble). EPA regional offices will review state applicationsto determine if the application is complete. Section 281.40(c) of the proposedrule allowed EPA 180 days for review and approval of complete state applications.Commenters suggested that this time period be shortened and that an additionaltime period be established for determination of the completeness of anapplication. EPA has decided, however, to promulgate this section substantiallyas proposed because section 9004 of RCRA establishes 180 days as the timeperiod for accepting and reviewing state applications, and EPA does notbelieve that it is possible to accommodate all the required proceduresin a shorter period. For example, 30 of these 180 days are necessary fora public comment period. EPA staff will be available to states to workwith them in developing both their applications and programs. Additionally,EPA encourages states to participate in pre-application reviews with theAgency's regional offices in order to facilitate final approval and ensurethat applications will be complete upon submittal. Comments on other aspects of the approval procedures were not received.The Agency includes a brief description of the process here for informationalpurposes. As part of the application review process, under andSection; 281.50(e)of the final rule, the EPA Regional Administrator will make a tentativerecommendation on approval or disapproval. EPA then will publish a tentativedetermination in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>and allow 30 days for public notice and comment.EPA will hold a public hearing if there is sufficient public interest shownduring the comment period. Next, under andSection; 281.50(f) of the finalrule, the EPA Regional Administrator will evaluate the public commentsand make a final decision on approval or disapproval within the statutorilymandated 180 days. EPA will publish this decision in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. <ITAG tagnum="81">2. Interim Approval (andSection; 281.51) </ITAG>Section 281.51 of the final rule establishes the procedures for approvalof state revisions to interim programs. Initially, state programs may beapproved for a period of 1 to 3 years from the date of promulgation ofthe federal technical standards, even if their requirements are less stringentthan federal standards for: Release detection; release reporting and investigation;and out-of-service or closed UST systems. States seeking interim approvalare required to submit a schedule (discussed in section IV.B. of this preamble)that outlines the major steps and milestones for obtaining the additionalstatutory and/or regulatory authorities necessary for final program approval.States applying for interim approval must submit to EPA an amended applicationwith their completed program revisions by the end of the applicable timeperiod. The amended application need only cover changes in the state programsince the award of interim approval. EPA must review this amended applicationusing the same procedures applied to the original application. The RegionalAdministrator will publish the tentative determination on the amended applicationin the <T4>Federal Register</T4>, and will make a final determination within 180days. In the April 17 proposal, the Agency proposed in andSection; 281.41(e)that the approved status of the state's interim program would expire automaticallyif EPA disapproves its amended application. One commenter expressed concernthat this provision does not allow for instances where a program amendmentis submitted and disapproved early in the specified time frame, when opportunitystill exists to correct the deficiencies and reapply. EPA did not intendthis situation to occur and has added language to clarify the situation.A state may re-submit an application any time until the last day of itsallowed interim period. The state program will revert to EPA only if thestate submission is disapproved and a revised application is not submittedbefore expiration of the interim period. If a state application for finalapproval is received at the end of the interim period, EPA will evaluatethe submission after termination of the interim period and will eitherdetermine the state's program to be complete and approvable, or will determinethe application to be unapprovable, in which case the state program willautomatically revert to EPA. EPA interprets the interim period as that period of time the state hasto submit an amended application. States seeking interim and then finalapproval are required to submit two separate approval applications forinterim and final approval and undergo the 180-day EPA review twice. Statesreceiving interim approval must submit a complete application for finalapproval by the end of the interim period or automatic expiration of approvalwill occur. The expiration of interim approval under Subtitle I does notrequire EPA to terminate or withdraw the program, because the approvalterminates automatically under the statute. State programs with expiredinterim approval may, through a Memorandum of Understanding with EPA, continueto implement parts of the federal UST program until they apply for andreceive final approval. <ITAG tagnum="81">3. Revision of Approved State Programs (andSection; 281.52) </ITAG>At some point in the future it may be necessary for states to submit revisionsto approved programs for approval by EPA. This need for revision may occur,for example, when federal or state authorities are changed by new legislationor rulemaking. EPA will treat revised applications in the same way as amendedapplications in that only those program areas affected by the change willbe subject to review by EPA; however, the review process will be streamlined.Instead of publishing a tentative determination in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>, EPA will publish a proposed determination thatmay become final immediately after 60 days. This ``immediate-final'' rulemakingprocedure has been used in state program approval under Subtitle C of RCRA,and for approval of revisions to State Implementation Plans under the CleanAir Act.One commenter asked whether the meaning of ``adverse comments'' in proposedandSection; 281.42(c) referred to public comments opposing EPA's decisionor to public comments supporting program disapproval. In today's rulemakingthe Agency has clarified the meaning of that section by explicitly referringto ``significant negative comment opposing the proposed revision''. IfEPA receives public comments that strongly oppose the proposed revisionand provide good reasons for EPA to reconsider its decision, the Agencymay choose one of two options. The Agency may publish a notice in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>withdrawing the immediate-final decision andreturn to the procedures for initial and amended applications (found inandSection; 281.50). Alternatively, the Agency may publish a notice in the<T4>Federal Register </T4>that responds to the significant negative commentsand describes the Agency's final decision. In addition, if EPA has reasonto believe that a particular revision will receive significant negativecomment, EPA may choose to follow the usual review procedures for programapplications, rather than begin with the immediate-final rulemaking process.One commenter misunderstood EPA's intent in this last case. EPA will notreject a revision simply because negative public comment is anticipatedor received. Rather, the procedures for publishing EPA's determinationregarding the state's application will follow those procedures normallyused rather than the streamlined immediate-final rulemaking procedures.This course of action allows more time for the consideration of publiccomment. F. Subpart F_Withdrawal of Approval of State Programs (andSection;andSection;281.60 through 281.61) No comments were received on this part of the proposed regulations. EPAis promulgating these sections substantially as proposed. EPA has designedtwo withdrawal procedures for circumstances (1) when an approved statevoluntarily transfers program responsibilities back to EPA, or (2) whenEPA initiates proceedings to determine if approval of a state program shouldbe withdrawn. If EPA initiates withdrawal, the proceedings are to be conductedin accordance with adjudicatory hearing proceedings as outlined in 40 CFR271.23 (b) and (c) of the RCRA Subtitle C state program approval regulation.EPA considered, but has rejected at this time, an alternative to the SubtitleC approach calling for withdrawal procedures by regulation rather thanan adjudicatory hearing process. An example of this alternative approachis found in 40 CFR 145.34, under the Underground Injection Control (UIC)program. Subtitle I of RCRA, covering the regulation of underground storagetank systems, lacks the explicit statutory direction provided to the UICprogram under the Safe Drinking Water Act, and a precedent for adjudicatoryhearings in withdrawal proceedings has been established for RCRA underSubtitle C. (The Agency is, however, re-evaluating the withdrawal proceduresfound in 40 CFR 271.23 of the Subtitle C state program approval regulations.Since this rule incorporates those procedures by reference, any final Agencychanges will automatically take effect in andSection;andSection; 281.60 through281.61 of today's rule.) No public comments were received on this issue,so EPA has chosen to incorporate the adjudicatory hearing procedures. In andSection; 281.60(a) of today's final rule, the Agency has clarifiedthe criteria for withdrawal of state program approval. The criteria proposedon April 17, 1987 required the Agency to consider whether a state is takingtimely and appropriate enforcement action and to evaluate the quality andnumber of state compliance inspections. The Agency is promulgating finalcriteria that are more consistent with the requirements for adequate enforcementas promulgated today, by emphasizing its expectations for quality enforcementactions rather than quantitative successes. The final withdrawal criteriarequire the Agency to consider whether the state agency is implementingan adequate enforcement program by evaluating the quality of state enforcementactions. The criteria for withdrawal also include failure to have adequate statutoryor regulatory authority. This would include failure to submit an applicationfor program revision when requested by EPA as a result of changes to SubtitleI statutory authorities or regulatory provisions. However, the final rulecontains no provisions setting a timeframe for states to submit such applications.The appropriate timeframe for such revisions has been a difficult issuein other state approval programs. The Agency intends to provide a timeframefor revisions of Subtitle I state programs each time a change in federalstatutory or regulatory provisions is published in a notice in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. Finally, the Agency is making one change to andSection; 281.60(a) to change``the Administrator must'' to ``the Administrator may'' withdraw programapproval. This change now makes andSection; 281.60(a) consistent with andSection;271.22(a) of the RCRA Subtitle C regulations. It was the Agency's intentionto use the same approach for withdrawing program approval as the SubtitleC program, and this correction has been made to reflect that intention.<ITAG tagnum="84">V. Relationship to Other EPA Programs </ITAG>A. Leaking Underground Storage Tank Petroleum Response Fund The Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986 amended SubtitleI to establish a Leaking Underground Storage Tank (LUST) Trust Fund toprovide funds for corrective action and enforcement for releases from USTsstoring petroleum. The long-term goals of the Trust Fund cleanup programand UST prevention program are to protect human health and the environment,primarily from releases to ground water caused by leaking USTs. Cleaningup releases using the Trust Fund is an immediate need, but by itself isa short-term and temporary solution. The long-term solution is for statesto develop prevention programs, which over time will result in fewer leakingtanks needing cleanup responses. States must also develop financial assurancemechanisms that will provide funds for future cleanups. EPA, therefore, has made a link between the LUST Trust Fund and UST regulatoryprogram to ensure that future contamination is minimized. After the effectivedate of today's final rule, a state's success in making reasonable progresstoward submitting a completed application for state program approval maybe grounds for increasing state access to the Trust Fund in FY 90 and thereafter.EPA realizes that ``reasonable progress'' toward submitting a completeapplication will vary depending upon the status of the individual stateprogram. EPA intends to develop criteria for measuring state progress,and will evaluate progress for each individual state during FY 89.B. RCRA Hazardous Waste Program State UST program requirements and approval procedures will be treatedindependently of state authorization under other related EPA programs.Federal UST legislation, under Subtitle I of RCRA, was developed to addressan environmental problem not adequately covered by existing EPA programs.Regulations governing tanks storing <T3>hazardous wastes</T3> have been promulgated under Subtitle C (40 CFRParts 264 and 265, July 14, 1986). These regulations are only applicableto hazardous wastes, the storage of which is exempted from today's technicalstandards under andSection; 280.10. Approval of a state UST program underSubtitle I of RCRA does not entitle a state to implement hazardous wastetank requirements under Subtitle C of RCRA. For additional information,see ``Relationship to Other EPA Programs'' discussed under the promulgationof federal UST technical standards, published elsewhere in today's <T4>Federal Register</T4>. <ITAG tagnum="84">VI. Economic and Regulatory Impacts </ITAG>A. Regulatory Impact Analysis Under Executive Order 12291, EPA must determine whether a new regulationis a ``major'' rule and prepare a Regulatory Impact Analysis (RIA) in connectionwith a major rule. A ``major'' rule is defined as one that is likely toresult in: (1) An annual effect on the economy of $100 million or more;(2) a major increase in costs or prices for consumers, individual industries,federal, state, and local government agencies or geographic regions; or(3) significant adverse effects on competition, employment, investment,productivity, innovation, or on the ability of U.S.-based enterprises indomestic or export markets. In the April 17 proposal, the Agency statedits belief that an RIA was not needed for the Part 281 rulemaking. One commenter requested that a regulatory impact analysis be performedfor the Part 281 regulations, but EPA still believes that this regulationwill have none of the above effects. The requirements for state UST programsas outlined in this proposal will not add substantial costs beyond thoseimposed under the federal UST regulations proposed elsewhere in today's<T4>Federal Register</T4>. Because this rulemaking does not meet the definitionof a major regulation, the Agency has not conducted a Regulatory ImpactAnalysis. A Regulatory Impact Analysis, however, has been prepared forthe federal technical requirements and the results are described in thepreamble to that regulation, published elsewhere in today's <T4>Federal Register</T4>. Today's rulemaking was submitted to the Officeof Management and Budget (OMB) for review as required by Executive Order12291. B. Regulatory Flexibility Act The Regulatory Flexibility Act (5 U.S.C. 601 <T3>et seq.</T3>) requires an agency to prepare and make available forpublic comment a regulatory flexibility analysis that describes the impactof a proposed or final rule on small entities (i.e., small businesses,small organizations, and small governmental jurisdictions). No regulatoryflexibility analysis is required if the head of an agency certifies therule will not have significant economic impact on a substantial numberof small entities. This rule, in itself, will not have a significant impact on a substantialnumber of small entities, because federal UST requirements will alreadybe in effect in all states seeking program approval subsequent to promulgationof federal UST requirements under Subtitle I. Therefore, no regulatoryflexibility analysis has been prepared. EPA has determined that the finalrule for UST technical standards under Subtitle I, published elsewherein today's <T4>Federal Register</T4>, will have a significant economic impact on asubstantial number of small entities based on the analysis prepared forthe final rule. C. Paperwork Reduction Act The information collection requirements in this rule have been approvedby the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) under the <T3>Paperwork Reduction Act</T3>, 44 U.S.C. 3501 <T3>et seq., </T3>and have been assigned OMB Control Number 2050-0067.The one-time reporting and recordkeeping burden on the public for thiscollection is estimated at 15,272 total hours, or 1,632 hours for the 6respondents per year over nine years (with an average of 272 hours perresponse). These burden estimates include all aspects of the collectioneffort and may include time for reviewing instructions, searching existingdata sources, gathering and maintaining the data needed, completing andreviewing the collection of information, etc. If you wish to submit comments regarding any aspect of this collectionof information, including suggestions for reducing the burden, or if youwould like a copy of the information collection request (please referenceICF #1355), contact Rick Westlund, Information Policy Branch, PM-223, U.S.Environmental Protection Agency, 401 M Street SW., Washington, DC 20460(202-382-2745); and Marcus Peacock, Office of Information and RegulatoryAffairs, Office of Management and Budget, Washington, DC 20503. The finalrule will respond to any OMB or public comments on the information collectionrequirements contained in this proposal.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 40 CFR Part 281 </ITAG>Administrative practice and procedure, Hazardous materials, Petroleum,State program approval, Underground storage tanks.<ITAG tagnum="21">Date: September 8, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Lee M. Thomas, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Administrator. </ITAG>For reasons set out in the preamble, Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulationsis amended by adding a new Part 281 as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 281_APPROVAL OF STATE UNDERGROUND STORAGE TANK PROGRAMS </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_Purpose, General Requirements and Scope</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">281.10 Purpose. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">281.11 General requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">281.12 Scope and definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart B_Components of a Program Application </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">281.20 Program application. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">281.21 Description of state program. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">281.22 Procedures for adequate enforcement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">281.23 Schedule for interim approval. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">281.24 Memorandum of agreement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">281.25 Attorney General's statement. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart C_Criteria for No Less Stringent </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">281.30 New UST system design, construction, installation, and notification.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">281.31 Upgrading existing UST systems. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">281.32 General operating requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">281.33 Release detection. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">281.34 Release reporting, investigation, and confirmation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">281.35 Release response and corrective action. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">281.36 Out-of-service UST systems and closure. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">281.37 Financial responsibility for USTs containing petroleum. [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">281.38 Financial responsibility for USTs containing hazardous substances.[Reserved] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart D_Adequate Enforcement of Compliance </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">281.40 Requirements for compliance monitoring program and authority.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">281.41 Requirements for enforcement authority. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">281.42 Requirements for public participation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">281.43 Sharing of information. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart E_Approval Procedures </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">281.50 Approval procedures for state programs. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">281.51 Amendment required at end of interim period. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">281.52 Revision of approved state programs. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart F_Withdrawal of Approval of State Programs </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">281.60 Criteria for withdrawal of approval of state programs. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">281.61 Procedures for withdrawal of approval of state programs.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sections 2002, 9004, 9005, 9006 of the Solid WasteDisposal Act, as amended by the Resource Conservation and Recovery Actof 1976, as amended (42 U.S.C. 6912, 6991 (c), (d), (e)). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_Purpose, General Requirements and Scope </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 281.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose. </ITAG>(a) This subpart specifies the requirements that state programs must meetfor approval by the Administrator under section 9004 of RCRA, and the proceduresEPA will follow in approving, revising and withdrawing approval of stateprograms. (b) State submissions for program approval must be in accordance with theprocedures set out in this part. (c) A state may apply for approval under this subpart at any time afterthe promulgation of release detection, prevention, and correction regulationsunder section 9003 of RCRA. (d) Any state program approved by the Administrator under this part shallat all times be conducted in accordance with the requirements of this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 281.11</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General requirements. </ITAG>(a) <T3>State program elements. </T3>The following substantive elements ofa state program must be addressed in a state application for approval:(1) Requirements for all existing and new underground storage tanks: (i) New UST systems (design, construction, installation, and notification);(ii) Upgrading of existing UST systems; (iii) General operating requirements; (iv) Release detection; (v) Release reporting, investigation, and confirmation; (vi) Out-of-service USTs and closure; (vii) Release response and corrective action; and (viii) Financial responsibility for UST systems containing petroleum. (2) Provisions for adequate enforcement of compliance with the above programelements. (b) <T3>Final approval. </T3>The state must demonstrate that its requirementsunder each state program element for existing and new UST systems are noless stringent than the corresponding federal requirements as set forthin Subpart C of this part, except as provided in paragraph (c) of thissection. The state must also demonstrate that it has a program that providesadequate enforcement of compliance with these requirements. (c) <T3>Interim approval. </T3>(1) The Administrator may approve state programswith requirements less stringent than the federal requirements for a periodof 1 to 3 years from September 23, 1988. Such interim approval may be grantedonly if state regulatory and/or legislative change is required in orderfor the state program to be no less stringent than the federal requirementsand standards under Part 280 for one or more of the following program elements:Release detection at existing UST systems; release reporting and investigation;and out-of-service or closed UST systems. (2) A state program may receive interim approval if it: (i) Has requirements for three elements: (A) Release Detection; (B) Release Reporting, Investigation, and Confirmation; and (C) Out-of-Service UST Systems and Closure; and (ii) Has requirements that are no less stringent than the correspondingfederal requirements for five elements: (A) New UST System Design, Construction, Installation and Notification;(B) Upgrading Existing UST Systems; (C) General Operating Requirements; (D) Release Response and Corrective Action; and (E) Financial Responsibility for UST systems containing petroleum; and(iii) Provides for adequate enforcement of compliance with these requirements.(3) A state with a program that has received interim approval must receivefinal approval of an amended program containing program elements that areno less stringent than the corresponding federal program elements underSubpart C in accordance with the following schedule: (i) If only state regulatory action is required, the state must submitan amended program to EPA for approval before September 23, 1989. (ii) If only state legislative action is required, the state must submitan amended program to EPA for approval before September 23, 1990. (iii) If both state legislative and regulatory action are required, thestate must submit an amended program to EPA for approval before September23, 1991. (d) States with programs approved under this part are authorized to administerthe state program in lieu of the federal program and will have primaryenforcement responsibility with respect to the requirements of the approvedprogram. EPA retains authority to take enforcement action in approved statesas necessary and will notify the designated lead state agency of any suchintended action. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 281.12</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope and definitions. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Scope. </T3>(1) The Administrator may approve either partial or completestate programs. A ``partial'' state program regulates either solely USTsystems containing petroleum or solely UST systems containing hazardoussubstances. If a ``partial'' state program is approved, EPA will administerthe remaining part of the program. A ``complete'' state program regulatesboth petroleum and hazardous substance tanks. (2) EPA will administer the UST program on Indian lands, except where Congresshas clearly expressed an intention to grant a state authority to regulatepetroleum and hazardous substance USTs on Indian lands. In either case,this decision will not impair a state's ability to obtain program approvalfor petroleum and/or hazardous substances on non-Indian lands in accordancewith this part. (3) Nothing in this subpart precludes a state from: (i) Adopting or enforcing requirements that are more stringent or moreextensive than those required under this part; or (ii) Operating a program with a greater scope of coverage than that requiredunder this part. Where an approved state program has a greater scope ofcoverage than required by federal law, the additional coverage is not partof the federally-approved program. (b) <T3>Definitions. </T3>(1) The definitions in Part 280 apply to all subpartsof this part. (2) For the purpose of this part, the term ``interim approval'' means theapproval received by a state program that meets the requirements in andSection;281.11(c) (1) and (2) for the time period defined in andSection; 281.11(c)(3).(3) For the purposes of this part the term ``final approval'' means theapproval received by a state program that meets the requirements in andSection;281.11(b).<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Components of a Program Application </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 281.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Program application. </ITAG>Any state that seeks to administer a program under this part must submitan application containing the following parts: (a) A transmittal letter from the Governor of the state requesting programapproval; (b) A description in accordance with andSection; 281.21 of the state programand operating procedures; (c) A demonstration of the state's procedures to ensure adequate enforcement;(d) A schedule for obtaining needed authorities under interim approval,where applicable; (e) A Memorandum of Agreement outlining roles and responsibilities of EPAand the implementing agency; (f) An Attorney General's statement in accordance with andSection; 281.25certifying to applicable state authorities; and (g) Copies of all applicable state statutes and regulations.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>EPA has designed an optional application form that is availablefor use by state applicants. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 281.21</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Description of state program. </ITAG>A state seeking to administer a program under this part must submit a descriptionof the program it proposes to administer under state law in lieu of thefederal program. The description of a state's existing or planned programmust include: (a) The scope of the state program: (1) Whether the state program regulates UST systems containing petroleumor hazardous substances, or both; (2) Whether the state is applying for interim or final approval; (3) Whether the state program is more stringent or broader in scope thanthe federal program, and in what ways; and (4) Whether the state has any existing authority over Indian lands or hasexisting agreements with Indian tribes relevant to the regulation of undergroundstorage tanks. (b) The organization and structure of the state and local agencies withresponsibility for administering the program. The jurisdiction and responsibilitiesof all state and local implementing agencies must be delineated, appropriateprocedures for coordination set forth, and one state agency designatedas a ``lead agency'' to facilitate communications between EPA and the state.(c) Staff resources to carry out and enforce the required state programelements, both existing and planned, including the number of employees,agency where employees are located, general duties of the employees, andcurrent limits or restrictions on hiring or utilization of staff. (d) An existing state funding mechanism to meet the estimated costs ofadministering and enforcing the required state program elements, and anyrestrictions or limitations upon this funding. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 281.22</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Procedures for adequate enforcement. </ITAG>A state must submit a description of its compliance monitoring and enforcementprocedures, including related state administrative or judicial review procedures.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 281.23</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Schedule for interim approval. </ITAG>For a state program that must modify its statutory or regulatory requirementsfor release detection, release reporting and investigation, and out-of-serviceor closed UST systems in order to be no less stringent than the federalrequirements, the plan must include a schedule for making such changesand for submitting an amendment to the state application in accordancewith andSection; 281.51. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 281.24</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Memorandum of agreement. </ITAG>EPA and the approved state will negotiate a Memorandum of Agreement (MOA)containing proposed areas of coordination and shared responsibilities betweenthe state and EPA and separate EPA and state roles and responsibilitiesin areas including, but not limited to: Implementation of partial stateprograms; enforcement; compliance monitoring; EPA oversight; and sharingand reporting of information. At the time of approval, the MOA must besigned by the Regional Administrator and the appropriate official of thestate lead agency. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 281.25</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Attorney General's statement. </ITAG>(a) A state must submit a written demonstration from the Attorney Generalthat the laws and regulations of the state provide adequate authority tocarry out the program described under andSection; 281.21 and to meet otherrequirements of this part. This statement may be signed by independentlegal counsel for the state rather than the Attorney General, providedthat such counsel has full authority to independently represent the stateAgency in court on all matters pertaining to the state program. This statementmust include citations to the specific statutes, administrative regulations,and where appropriate, judicial decisions that demonstrate adequate authorityto regulate and enforce requirements for UST systems. State statutes andregulations cited by the state Attorney General must be fully effectivewhen the program is approved. (b) If a state currently has authority over underground storage tank activitieson Indian Lands, the statement must contain an appropriate analysis ofthe state's authority.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Note: The reporting requirements under this section have been approvedby the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) and have been assigned OMBControl Number 2050-0067. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart C_Criteria for No-Less-Stringent </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 281.30</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">New UST system design, construction, installation, and notification.</ITAG>In order to be considered no less stringent than the corresponding federalrequirements for new UST system design, construction, installation, andnotification, the state must have requirements that ensure all new undergroundstorage tanks, and the attached piping in contact with the ground and usedto convey the regulated substance stored in the tank, conform to the following:(a) Be designed, constructed, and installed in a manner that will preventreleases for their operating life due to manufacturing defects, structuralfailure, or corrosion.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>Codes of practice developed by nationally-recognized organizationsand national independent testing laboratories may be used to demonstratethat the state program requirements are no less stringent in this area.</ITAG>(b) Be provided with equipment to prevent spills and tank overfills whennew tanks are installed or existing tanks are upgraded, unless the tankdoes not receive more than 25 gallons at one time. (c) All UST system owners and operators must notify the implementing stateagency of the existence of any new UST system using a form designated bythe state agency. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 281.31</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Upgrading existing UST systems. </ITAG>In order to be considered no less stringent than the corresponding federalupgrading requirements, the state must have requirements that ensure existingUST systems will be replaced or upgraded before December 22, 1998, to preventreleases for their operating life due to corrosion, and spills or overfills.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 281.32</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General operating requirements. </ITAG>In order to be considered no less stringent than the corresponding federalgeneral operating requirements, the state must have requirements that ensureall new and existing UST systems conform to the following: (a) Prevent spills and overfills by ensuring that the space in the tankis sufficient to receive the volume to be transferred and that the transferoperation is monitored constantly; (b) Where equipped with cathodic protection, be operated and maintainedby a person with sufficient training and experience in preventing corrosion,and in a manner that ensures that no releases occur during the operatinglife of the UST system;<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>Codes of practice developed by nationally-recognized organizationsand national independent testing laboratories may be used to demonstratethe state program requirements are no less stringent.</ITAG>(c) Be made of or lined with materials that are compatible with the substancestored; (d) At the time of upgrade or repair, be structurally sound and upgradedor repaired in a manner that will prevent releases due to structural failureor corrosion during their operating lives; (e) Have records of monitoring, testing, repairs, and closure maintainedthat are sufficient to demonstrate recent facility compliance status, exceptthat records demonstrating compliance with repair and upgrading requirementsmust be maintained for the remaining operating life of the facility. Theserecords must be made readily available when requested by the implementingagency. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 281.33</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Release detection. </ITAG>In order to be considered no less stringent than the corresponding federalrequirements for release detection, the state must have requirements thatat a minimum ensure all UST systems are provided with release detectionthat conforms to the following: (a) <T3>General methods. </T3>Release detection requirements for owners andoperators must consist of a method, or combination of methods, that is:(1) Capable of detecting a release of the regulated substance from anyportion of the UST system that routinely contains regulated substances_aseffectively as any of the methods allowed under the federal technical standards_foras long as the UST system is in operation. In comparing methods, the implementingagency shall consider the size of release that the method can detect andthe speed and reliability with which the release can be detected. (2) Designed, installed, calibrated, operated and maintained so that releaseswill be detected in accordance with the capabilities of the method. (b) <T3>Phase-in of requirements. </T3>Release detection requirements must,at a minimum, be scheduled to be applied at all UST systems: (1) Immediately when a new UST system is installed:(2) On an orderly schedule that completes a phase-in of release detectionat all existing UST systems (or their closure) before December 21, 1993,except that release detection for the piping attached to any existing USTthat conveys a regulated substance under greater than atmospheric pressuremust be phased-in before December 22, 1990. (c) <T3>Requirements for petroleum tanks. </T3>All petroleum tanks must besampled, tested, or checked for releases at least monthly, except that:(1) New or upgraded tanks (that is, tanks and piping protected from releasesdue to corrosion and equipped with both spill and overfill prevention devices)may temporarily use monthly inventory control (or its equivalent) in combinationwith tightness testing (or its equivalent) conducted every 5 years forthe first 10 years after the tank is installed or upgraded or until December22, 1998, whichever is later; and (2) Existing tanks unprotected from releases due to corrosion or withoutspill and overfill prevention devices may use monthly inventory control(or its equivalent) in combination with annual tightness testing (or itsequivalent) until December 22, 1998. (d) <T3>Requirements for petroleum piping. </T3>All underground piping attachedto the tank that routinely conveys petroleum must conform to the following:(1) If the petroleum is conveyed under greater than atmospheric pressure:(i) The piping must be equipped with release detection that detects a releasewithin an hour by restricting or shutting off flow or sounding an alarm;and (ii) The piping must have monthly monitoring applied or annual tightnesstests conducted. (2) If suction lines are used: (i) Tightness tests must be conducted at least once every 3 years, unlessa monthly method of detection is applied to this piping; or (ii) The piping is designed to allow the contents of the pipe to drainback into the storage tank if the suction is released and is also designedto allow an inspector to immediately determine the integrity of the pipingsystem. (e) <T3>Requirements for hazardous substance UST systems. </T3>All UST systemsstoring hazardous substances must meet the following: (1) All existing hazardous substance UST systems must comply with all therequirements for petroleum UST systems in paragraphs (c) and (d) of thissection and after December 22, 1998, they must comply with the followingparagraph (e)(2) of this section. (2) All new hazardous substance UST systems must use interstitial monitoringwithin secondary containment of the tanks and the attached undergroundpiping that conveys the regulated substance stored in the tank, unlessthe owner and operator can demonstrate to the state (or the state otherwisedetermines) that another method will detect a release of the regulatedsubstance as effectively as other methods allowed under the state programfor petroleum UST systems and that effective corrective action technologyis available for the hazardous substance being stored that can be usedto protect human health and the environment. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 281.34</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Release reporting, investigation, and confirmation. </ITAG>In order to be considered no less stringent than the corresponding federalrequirements for release reporting, investigation, and confirmation, thestate must have requirements that ensure all owners and operators conformwith the following: (a) Promptly investigate all suspected releases, including: (1) When unusual operating conditions, release detection signals and environmentalconditions at the site suggest a release of regulated substances may haveoccurred; and (2) When required by the implementing agency to determine the source ofa release having an impact in the surrounding area; and (b) Promptly report all confirmed underground releases and any spills andoverfills that are not contained and cleaned up. (c) Ensure that all owners and operators contain and clean up unreportedspills and overfills in a manner that will protect human health and theenvironment.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 281.35</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Release response and corrective action. </ITAG>In order to be considered no less stringent than the corresponding federalrequirements for release response and corrective action, the state musthave requirements that ensure: (a) All releases from UST systems are promptly assessed and further releasesare stopped; (b) Actions are taken to identify, contain and mitigate any immediate healthand safety threats that are posed by a release (such activities includeinvestigation and initiation of free product removal, if present); (c) All releases from UST systems are investigated to determine if thereare impacts on soil and ground water, and any nearby surface waters. Theextent of soil and ground water contamination must be delineated when apotential threat to human health and the environment exists. (d) All releases from UST systems are cleaned up through soil and groundwater remediation and any other steps, as necessary to protect human healthand the environment; (e) Adequate information is made available to the state to demonstratethat corrective actions are taken in accordance with the requirements ofparagraphs (a) through (d) of this section. This information must be submittedin a timely manner that demonstrates its technical adequacy to protecthuman health and the environment; and (f) In accordance with andSection; 280.67, the state must notify the affectedpublic of all confirmed releases requiring a plan for soil and ground waterremediation, and upon request provide or make available information toinform the interested public of the nature of the release and the correctivemeasures planned or taken. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 281.36</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Out-of-service UST systems and closure. </ITAG>In order to be considered no less stringent than the corresponding federalrequirements for temporarily closed UST systems and permanent closure,the state must have requirements that ensure UST systems conform with thefollowing: (a) Removal from service. All new and existing UST systems temporarilyclosed must: (1) Continue to comply with general operating requirements, release reportingand investigation, and release response and corrective action; (2) Continue to comply with release detection requirements if regulatedsubstances are stored in the tank; (3) Be closed off to outside access; and (4) Be permanently closed if the UST system has not been protected fromcorrosion and has not been used in one year, unless the state approvesan extension after the owner and operator conducts a site assessment. (b) Permanent closure of UST systems. All tanks and piping must be cleanedand permanently closed in a manner that eliminates the potential for safetyhazards and any future releases. The owner or operator must notify thestate of permanent UST system closures. The site must also be assessedto determine if there are any present or were past releases, and if so,release response and corrective action requirements must be complied with.(c) All UST systems taken out of service before the effective date of thefederal regulations must permanently close in accordance with paragraph(b) of this section when directed by the implementing agency. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 281.37</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Financial responsibility for USTs containing petroleum. EM [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 281.38</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Financial responsibility for USTs containing hazardous substances.[Reserved] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart D_Adequate Enforcement of Compliance </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 281.40</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirements for compliance monitoring program and authority. </ITAG>(a) Any authorized representative of the state engaged in compliance inspections,monitoring, and testing must have authority to obtain by request any informationfrom an owner or operator with respect to the UST system(s) that is necessaryto determine compliance with the regulations. (b) Any authorized representative of the state must have authority to requirean owner or operator to conduct monitoring or testing. (c) Authorized representatives must have the authority to enter any siteor premises subject to UST system regulations or in which records relevantto the operation of the UST system(s) are kept, and to copy these records,obtain samples of regulated substances, and inspect or conduct the monitoringor testing of UST system(s). (d) State programs must have procedures for receipt, evaluation, retention,and investigation of records and reports required of owners or operatorsand must provide for enforcement of failure to submit these records andreports. (e)(1) State programs must have inspection procedures to determine, independentof information supplied by regulated persons, compliance with program requirements,and must provide for enforcement of failure to comply with the programrequirements. States must maintain a program for systematic inspectionsof facilities subject to regulations in a manner designed to determinecompliance or non-compliance, to verify accuracy of information submittedby owners or operators of regulated USTs, and to verify adequacy of methodsused by owners or operators in developing that information. (2) When inspections are conducted, samples taken, or other informationgathered, these procedures must be conducted in a manner (for example,using proper ``chain of custody'' procedures) that will produce evidenceadmissible in an enforcement proceeding, or in court. (f) Public effort in reporting violations must be encouraged and the stateenforcement agency(ies) must make available information on reporting procedures.State programs must maintain a program for investigating information obtainedfrom the public about suspected violations of UST program requirements.(g) The state program must maintain the data collected through inspectionsand evaluation of records in such a manner that the implementing agencycan monitor over time the compliance status of the regulated community.Any compilation, index, or inventory of such facilities and activitiesshall be made available to EPA upon request.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 281.41</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirements for enforcement authority. </ITAG>(a) Any state agency administering a program must have the authority toimplement the following remedies for violations of state program requirements:(1) To restrain immediately and effectively any person by order or by suitin state court from engaging in any unauthorized activity that is endangeringor causing damage to public health or the environment; (2) To sue in courts of competent jurisdiction to enjoin any threatenedor continuing violation of any program requirement; (3) To assess or sue to recover in court civil penalties as follows: (i) Civil penalties for failure to notify or for submitting false informationpursuant to tank notification requirements must be capable of being assessedup to $5,000 or more per violation. (ii) Civil penalties for failure to comply with any state requirementsor standards for existing or new tank systems must be capable of beingassessed for each instance of violation, up to $5,000 or more for eachtank for each day of violation. If the violation is continuous, civil penaltiesshall be capable of being assessed up to $5,000 or more for each day ofviolation. (b) The burden of proof and degree of knowledge or intent required understate law for establishing violations under paragraph (a)(3) of this section,must be no greater than the burden of proof or degree of knowledge or intentthat EPA must provide when it brings an action under Subtitle I of theResource Conservation and Recovery Act. (c) A civil penalty assessed, sought, or agreed upon by the state enforcementagency(ies) under paragraph (a)(3) of this section must be appropriateto the violation. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 281.42</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirements for public participation. </ITAG>Any state administering a program must provide for public participationin the state enforcement process by providing any one of the followingthree options: (a) Authority that allows intervention analogous to Federal Rule 24(a)(2),and assurance by the appropriate state enforcement agency that it willnot oppose intervention under the state analogue to Rule 24(a)(2) on theground that the applicant's interest is adequately represented by the State.(b) Authority that allows intervention as of right in any civil actionto obtain the remedies specified in andSection; 281.41 by any citizen havingan interest that is or may be adversely affected; or (c) Assurance by the appropriate state agency that: (1) It will provide notice and opportunity for public comment on all proposedsettlements of civil enforcement actions (except where immediate actionis necessary to adequately protect human health and the environment); (2) It will investigate and provide responses to citizen complaints aboutviolations; and (3) It will not oppose citizen intervention when permissive interventionis allowed by statute, rule, or regulation <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 281.43</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Sharing of information. </ITAG>(a) States with approved programs must furnish EPA, upon request, any informationin state files obtained or used in the administration of the state program.This information includes: (1) Any information submitted to the state under a claim of confidentiality.The state must submit that claim to EPA when providing such information.Any information obtained from a state and subject to a claim of confidentialitywill be treated in accordance with federal regulations in 40 CFR Part 2;and (2) Any information that is submitted to the state without a claim of confidentiality.EPA may make this information available to the public without further notice.(b) EPA must furnish to states with approved programs, upon request, anyinformation in EPA files that the state needs to administer its approvedstate program. Such information includes: (1) Any information that is submitted to EPA without a claim of confidentiality;and (2) Any information submitted to EPA under a claim of confidentiality,subject to the conditions in 40 CFR Part 2. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart E_Approval Procedures </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 281.50</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Approval procedures for state programs. </ITAG>(a) The following procedures are required for all applications, regardlessof whether the application is for a partial or complete program, as definedin andSection; 281.12, or for interim or final approval in accordance withandSection; 281.11. (b) Before submitting an application to EPA for approval of a state program,the state must provide an opportunity for public notice and comment inthe development of its underground storage tank program. (c) When EPA receives a state program application, EPA will examine theapplication and notify the state whether its application is complete, inaccordance with the application components required in andSection; 281.20.The 180-day statutory review period begins only after EPA has determinedthat a complete application has been received. (d) The state and EPA may by mutual agreement extend the review period.(e) After receipt of a complete program application, the Administratorwill tentatively determine approval or disapproval of the state program.EPA shall issue public notice of the tentative determination in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>; in enough of the largest newspapers in the stateto attract statewide attention; and to persons on the state agency mailinglist and any other persons who the agency has reason to believe are interested.Notice of the tentative determination must also: (1) Afford the public 30 days after the notice to comment on the state'sapplication and the Administrator's tentative determination; and (2) Include a general statement of the areas of concern, if the Administratorindicates the state program may not be approved; and (3) Note the availability for inspection by the public of the state programapplication; and (4) Indicate that a public hearing will be held by EPA no earlier than30 days after notice of the tentative determination unless insufficientpublic interest is expressed, at which time the Regional Administratormay cancel the public hearing. (f) Within 180 days of receipt of a complete state program application,the Administrator must make a final determination whether to approve thestate program after review of all public comments. EPA will give noticeof its determination in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>and codify the approved state program. The noticemust include a statement of the reasons for this determination and a responseto significant comments received. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 281.51</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Amendment required at end of interim period. </ITAG>(a) State programs that meet the requirements of section 281.11(c) (1)and (2) may be approved for 1 to 3 years from September 23, 1988. Statesthat receive such interim approval must adopt requirements that are noless stringent than the corresponding federal requirements and standardswithin the timeframes specified under andSection; 281.11(c)(3). (b) By the end of the specified time period, a state with interim approvalmust submit to EPA an amendment to its application that includes all modifiedand new requirements for any of the elements containing less stringentrequirements. Such amended applications must also include a modified programdescription, an Attorney General's statement and a Memorandum of Agreementthat incorporate the amended program requirements, and copies of all applicablestate statutes and regulations. (c) Upon receipt of the application amendment, the Administrator shallfollow the same review and approval procedures as required in andSection;281.50. (d) If a state fails to submit an amendment within the specified timeframe,the interim approval of the state program expires upon the applicable dateestablished under andSection; 281.11(c), and the Subtitle I program automaticallyreverts to EPA. (e) If a state submits an amendment to the program application within thetimeframe specified under andSection; 281.11(c)(3) and the amendmant is disapprovedafter the end of the time period, the interim approval of the state programexpires immediately upon disapproval and the Subtitle I program automaticallyreverts to EPA. (f) If interim approval of the state program expires, EPA must notify theregulated community and the public of the re-establishment of the federalprogram through a notice in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 281.52</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Revision of approved state programs. </ITAG>(a) Either EPA or the approved state may initiate program revision. Programrevision may be necessary when the controlling federal or state statutoryor regulatory authority is changed or when responsibility for the stateprogram is shifted to a new agency or agencies. The state must inform EPAof any proposed modifications to its basic statutory or regulatory authorityor change in division of responsibility among state agencies. EPA willdetermine in each case whether a revision of the approved program is required.(b) Whenever the Administrator has reason to believe that circumstanceshave changed with respect to an approved state program or the federal program,the Administrator may request, and the state must provide, a revised applicationas prescribed by EPA. (c) The Administrator will approve or disapprove program revisions basedon the requirements of this Part and of Subtitle I pursuant to the proceduresunder this section, or under section 281.50 if EPA has reason to believethe proposed revision will receive significant negative comment from thepublic. (1) The Administrator must issue public notice of planned approval or disapprovalof a state program revision in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>; in enough of the largest newspapers in the stateto attract statewide attention; and by mailing to persons on the stateagency mailing list and to any other persons who the agency has reasonto believe are interested. The public notice must summarize the state programrevision, indicate whether EPA intends to approve or disapprove the revision,and provide for an opportunity to comment for a period of 30 days. (2) The Administrator's decision on the proposed revision becomes effective60 days after the date of publication in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>in accordance with paragraph (c)(1) of this section,unless significant negative comment opposing the proposed revision is receivedduring the comment period. If significant negative comment is received,EPA must notify the state and within 60 days after the date of publication,publish in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>either: (i) A withdrawal of the immediate final decision, which will then be treatedas a tentative decision in accordance with the applicable procedures ofandSection; 281.50 (e) and (f); or (ii) A notice that contains a response to significant negative commentsand affirms either that the immediate final decision takes effect or reversesthe decision. (d) Revised state programs that receive approval must be codified in the<T4>Federal Register</T4>. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart F_Withdrawal of Approval of State Programs </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 281.60</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Criteria for withdrawal of approval of state programs. </ITAG>(a) The Administrator may withdraw program approval when the Agency determinesthat a state no longer has adequate regulatory or statutory authority oris not administering and enforcing an approved program in accordance withthis part. The state must have adequate capability to administer and enforcethe state program. In evaluating whether such capability exists, the Agencywill consider whether the state is implementing an adequate enforcementprogram by evaluating the quality of compliance monitoring and enforcementactions. (b) Such withdrawal of approval will occur only after the state fails totake appropriate action within a reasonable time, not to exceed 120 daysafter notice from the Administrator that the state is not administeringand enforcing its program in accordance with the requirements of this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 281.61</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Procedures for withdrawal of approval of state programs. </ITAG>(a) The following procedures apply when a state with an approved programvoluntarily transfers to EPA those program responsibilities required byfederal law. (1) The state must give EPA notice of the proposed transfer, and submit,at least 90 days before the transfer, a plan for the orderly transfer ofall relevant program information necessary for EPA to administer the program.(2) Within 30 days of receiving the state's transfer plan, EPA must evaluatethe plan and identify any additional information needed by the federalgovernment for program administration. (3) At least 30 days before the transfer is to occur, EPA must publishnotice of the transfer in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>; in enough of the largest newspapers in the stateto attract statewide attention; and to persons on appropriate state mailinglists. (b) When EPA begins proceedings to determine whether to withdraw approvalof a state program (either on its own initiative or in response to a petitionfrom an interested person), withdrawal proceedings must be conducted inaccordance with procedures set out in 40 CFR 271.23 (b) and (c), exceptfor andSection; 271.23(b)(8)(iii) to the extent that it deviates from requirementsunder andSection; 281.60.<ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-21159 Filed 9-22-88; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6560-50-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>